Maryland, session 2026, HB1548.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
10–206.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(1) a person while representing a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER
in a summary ejectment or a rent escrow proceeding in the District Court of Maryland;
(2) a person while representing a [tenant] RESIDENT in a summary
ejectment or a rent escrow proceeding in the District Court of Maryland if the person is:
(i) a law student practicing in a clinical law program at a law school
accredited by the American Bar Association with the in–court supervision of a faculty
member; or
(ii) employed by a nonprofit organization receiving grants from the
Maryland Legal Services Corporation and:
1. the person has training and experience;
2. the person is supervised by a lawyer; and
3. the supervising lawyer’s appearance is entered in the
proceeding;
Article – Business Regulation
8–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(k) “Owner” includes a homeowner, [tenant] RESIDENT, or other person who

HOUSE BILL 1548 5
buys, contracts for, orders, or is entitled to a home improvement.
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–6B–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following terms have the meanings indicated.
(s) (1) “Proprietary lease” means an agreement with the cooperative housing
corporation under which a member has an exclusive possessory interest in a unit and a
possessory interest in common with other members in that portion of a cooperative project
not constituting units and which creates a legal relationship of [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER and [tenant] RESIDENT between the cooperative housing corporation
and the member, respectively.
5–6B–05.
(a) (1) At least 180 days before a [tenant] RESIDENT is required to vacate a
portion of a residential rental facility used as a residence that is acquired or is to be
acquired by a cooperative housing corporation or that is owned by or is to be owned by a
corporation that may become a cooperative housing corporation, the owner and the
[landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER of each [tenant] RESIDENT in possession of a
portion of the residential rental facility shall give the [tenant] RESIDENT a notice in
substantially the form specified in subsection (f) of this section.
(2) For effective notice, the owner and the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER, at least 15 days before giving the notice required by this section, shall file with
the Secretary of State a copy of the notice, a list of the [tenants] RESIDENTS to whom the
owner and the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER anticipate giving notice, and an
affidavit in substantially the following form:
“I hereby affirm under the penalty of perjury that the notice requirements of §
5–6B–05 of the Corporations and Associations Article, if applicable, have been
fulfilled.
Developer
By ......................................................................................................................... ”
(3) (I) If a [tenant] RESIDENT first leases a portion of the premises as
a residence after the notice required by this subsection has been given, the owner and the
[landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER, if other than the owner, shall inform the [tenant]
RESIDENT in writing that the notice has been given.
(II) The [tenant] RESIDENT shall be so informed on or before signing
the lease or taking possession, whichever occurs first.
(b) The notice shall be considered to have been given to each [tenant] RESIDENT

HOUSE BILL 1548
if delivered by hand or mailed, postage prepaid, to the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S last known
address.
(c) A [tenant] RESIDENT leasing a portion of a residential rental facility as a
residence at the time the notice referred to in subsection (a) of this section is given to the
[tenant] RESIDENT may not be required to vacate the premises prior to the expiration of
180 days from the giving of the notice except for:
(1) Breach of a covenant in the lease occurring before or after the notice is
given;
(2) Nonpayment of rent occurring before or after the notice is given; or
(3) Failure of the [tenant] RESIDENT to vacate the premises at the time
that is indicated by the [tenant] RESIDENT in a notice given to the [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER under subsection (e) of this section.
(d) (1) If the lease term of a [tenant] RESIDENT who leases a portion of a
residential rental facility as a residence at the time the notice referred to in subsection (a)
of this section is given would ordinarily terminate during the 180–day period, the lease
term shall be extended, at the option of the [tenant] RESIDENT, until the expiration of the
180–day period.
(2) The extended term shall be at the same rent and on the same terms and
conditions as were applicable on the last day of the lease term.
(e) A [tenant] RESIDENT who leases a portion of a residential rental facility as a
residence at the time the notice referred to in subsection (a) of this section is given may
terminate the lease, without penalty for termination, upon at least 30 days’ written notice
to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER.
(f) (1) The notice referred to in subsection (a) of this section shall be sufficient
for the purposes of this section if it is in substantially the following form.
(2) [As to] FOR rental facilities containing fewer than 10 units, “Section 2”
of the notice is not required to be given.
“NOTICE OF INTENTION TO CREATE A COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION
.................................................. (date)
This is to inform you that the residential rental facility known as:.................... has
been or may be acquired by a cooperative housing corporation or that the current
owner of the residential rental facility has or may become a cooperative housing
corporation in accordance with the Maryland Cooperative Housing Corporation

HOUSE BILL 1548 7
Act. You may be required to move out of your residence after 180 days have passed
from the date of this notice, or in other words, after:........................... (date).
Section 1
Rights that Apply to All [Tenants] RESIDENTS
If you are a [tenant] RESIDENT in this residential rental facility and you
have not already given notice that you intend to move, you have the following
rights, provided you have previously paid your rent and continue to pay your rent
and abide by the other terms and conditions of your lease.
(1) You may remain in your residence on the same rent, terms,
and conditions of your existing lease until either the end of your lease term or until
............... (date) (the end of the 180–day period), whichever is later. If your lease
term ends during the 180–day period, it will be extended on the same rent, terms,
and conditions until ............... (date) (the end of the 180–day period). In addition,
certain households may be entitled to extend their leases beyond the 180 days as
described in Section 2.
(2) You have the right to purchase your residence before it can be
sold publicly. A purchase offer describing your right to purchase is included with
this notice.
(3) If you do not choose to purchase your residence, and the annual
income for all present members of your household did not exceed ................ (the
income eligibility figure for the appropriate area which equals approximately 80
percent of the median income for your county or standard metropolitan area) for
20__, you are entitled to receive $375 when you move out of your residence. You
are also entitled to be reimbursed for moving expenses, as defined in the Maryland
Cooperative Housing Corporation Act, over $375 up to $750 which are actually and
reasonably incurred. If the annual income for all present members of your
household did exceed ................ (the income eligibility figure for the appropriate
area which equals approximately 80 percent of the median income for your county
or standard metropolitan area) for 20__, you are entitled to be reimbursed up to
$750 for moving expenses, as defined in the Maryland Cooperative Housing
Corporation Act, actually and reasonably incurred. To receive reimbursement for
moving expenses, you must make a written request, accompanied by reasonable
evidence of your expenses, within 30 days after you move. You are entitled to be
reimbursed within 30 days after your request has been received.
(4) If you want to move out of your residence before the end of the
180–day period or the end of your lease, you may cancel your lease without penalty
by giving at least 30 days’ prior written notice. However, once you give notice of
when you intend to move, you will not have the right to remain in your residence
beyond that date.
Section 2

HOUSE BILL 1548
Right to 3–Year Lease Extension or 3–Month Rent Payment for Certain
Handicapped Citizens and Senior Citizens
The developer who converts this residential rental facility to a cooperative
housing corporation must offer extended leases to qualified households for up to
20 percent of the units in the residential rental facility. Households which receive
extended leases will have the right to continue renting their residences for at least
3 years from the date of this notice. A household may cancel an extended lease by
giving 3 months’ written notice if more than 1 year remains on the lease, and 1
month’s written notice if 1 year or less remains on the lease.
Rents under these extended leases may be increased only once each year
and are limited by increases in the cost of living index. Read the enclosed lease to
learn the additional rights and responsibilities of [tenants] RESIDENTS under
extended leases.
In determining whether your household qualifies for an extended lease, the
following definitions apply:
(1) “Handicapped citizen” means a person with a measurable
limitation of mobility due to congenital defect, disease, or trauma.
(2) “Senior citizen” means a person who is at least 62 years old on
the date of this notice.
(3) “Annual income” means the total income from all sources for
all present members of your household for the income tax year immediately
preceding the year in which this notice is issued, whether or not included in the
definition of gross income for federal or State tax purposes. For purposes of this
section, the inclusions to and exclusions from annual income are the same as for
“gross income” as that term is defined in § 9–104(a)(8) of the Tax – Property Article
for the property tax credits for homeowners by reason of income and age, reduced
by unreimbursed medical expenses if the [tenant] RESIDENT provides reasonable
evidence of the unreimbursed medical expenses or consents in writing to authorize
disclosure of relevant information regarding medical expense reimbursement at
the time of applying for an extended lease. Total income means the same as “gross
income” as defined in § 9–104(a)(8) of the Tax – Property Article.
To qualify for an extended lease you must meet all of the following criteria:
(1) A member of the household must be a handicapped citizen or
a senior citizen and must be living in your unit as of the date of this notice and
must have been a member of your household for at least the 12 months
immediately preceding the date of this notice;
(2) Annual income for all present members of your household
must not have exceeded ............... (80 percent of applicable median income) for

HOUSE BILL 1548 9
20__; and
(3) You must be current in your rental payment and otherwise be
in good standing under your existing lease.
If you meet all of these qualifications and you desire an extended lease, then
you must complete the enclosed form and execute the enclosed lease and return
the completed form and executed lease to the office listed below within 60 days
after the date of this notice, or in other words, by ............ (date). If your completed
form and executed lease are not received within that time, you will not be entitled
to an extended lease.
If the number of qualified households requesting extended leases exceeds
the 20 percent limitation, the extended leases shall be allocated as determined by
the local governing body. If the local governing body fails to provide for allocation,
units shall be allocated by the developer based on seniority by continuous length
of residence.
Due to the 20 percent limitation your application for an extended lease must
be processed before your lease becomes effective. Your lease will become effective
if it is determined that your household is qualified and falls within the 20 percent
limitation.
If you return the enclosed form and lease by ..........(date), you will be notified
within 75 days after the date of this notice, or in other words, by ..............(date),
whether you are qualified and whether your household falls within the 20 percent
limitation.
You may apply for an extended lease and, at the same time, choose to
purchase a cooperative interest. If you apply for and receive an extended lease,
your contract will be void. If you do not receive an extended lease, your contract
will be effective and you will be obligated to purchase a cooperative interest.
If you qualify for an extended lease, but due to the 20 percent limitation,
your lease is not effective, the developer must pay you an amount equal to 3
months’ rent within 15 days after you move. You are also entitled to up to $750
reimbursement for your moving expenses, as described in Section 1.
If you qualify for an extended lease, but do not want one, you are also
entitled to both the moving expense reimbursement previously described and the
payment equal to 3 months’ rent. In order to receive the 3 months’ rent payment,
you must complete and return the enclosed form within 60 days after the date of
this notice or by ............ (date), but you should not execute the enclosed lease.
All applications, forms, executed leases, and moving expense requests
should be addressed or delivered to:

HOUSE BILL 1548
......................................................................
......................................................................
..................................................................... ”
(g) The failure of a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER or owner to give
notice as required by this section is a defense to an action for possession.
(h) This section does not apply to a [tenant] RESIDENT whose lease term expires
during the 180–day period and who has given written notice of intent not to renew the lease
before the notice required by subsection (a) of this section is given.
(i) A [tenant] RESIDENT may not waive the rights under this section except as
otherwise provided under this subtitle.
(j) At the expiration of the 180–day period a [tenant] RESIDENT shall become a
[tenant] RESIDENT from month–to–month subject to the same rent, terms, and conditions
as those existing at the giving of the notice required by subsection (a) of this section, if the
[tenant’s] RESIDENT’S initial lease has expired and the [tenant] RESIDENT has not:
(1) Entered into a new lease;
(2) Vacated under subsection (e) of this section; or
(3) Been notified in accordance with applicable law prior to the expiration
of the 180–day period that the [tenant] RESIDENT must vacate at the end of that period.
5–6B–06.
(a) (1) An owner required to give notice under § 5–6B–05 of this subtitle shall
offer in writing to each [tenant] RESIDENT entitled to receive that notice the right to
purchase the cooperative interest which is coupled with the proprietary lease for that
portion of the residential rental facility occupied by the [tenant] RESIDENT as the
[tenant’s] RESIDENT’S residence. The offer shall be at a price and on terms and conditions
at least as favorable as the price, terms, and conditions offered for the cooperative interest
which is coupled with the proprietary lease for that portion of the residential rental facility
to any other person during the 180–day period following the giving of the notice required
by § 5–6B–05 of this subtitle. Settlement cannot be required any earlier than 120 days after
the offer is accepted by the [tenant] RESIDENT.
(2) (i) The cooperative housing corporation shall adopt uniform
objective standards concerning financial responsibility which shall apply to all [tenants]
RESIDENTS and initial purchasers.
(ii) The [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S acceptance of the owner’s offer is
conditioned on the [tenant] RESIDENT meeting the financial standards established by the
cooperative housing corporation under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.

HOUSE BILL 1548 11
(3) The offer to each [tenant] RESIDENT shall be made concurrently with
the giving of the notice required by § 5–6B–05 of this subtitle, shall be a part of that notice,
and shall state that:
(i) The offer will terminate upon the earlier to occur of termination
of the lease by the [tenant] RESIDENT or 60 days after delivery;
(ii) Acceptance of the offer by a [tenant] RESIDENT who meets the
criteria for an extended lease under § 5–6B–07(b) of this subtitle is contingent upon the
[tenant] RESIDENT not receiving an extended lease;
(iii) Settlement cannot be required earlier than 120 days after
acceptance by the [tenant] RESIDENT; and
(iv) The household is entitled to reimbursement for moving expenses
as provided in subsection (h) of this section.
(4) Delivery of a notice in the form specified in § 5–6B–05(f) of this subtitle
meets the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.
(b) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, an
owner may make alterations or additions to the size, location, configuration, and physical
condition of the residential rental facility. The developer is not required to make the
boundaries of a portion of the residential rental facility occupied by a [tenant] RESIDENT
as the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S residence coincide with the boundaries of a proposed unit.
(2) If the boundaries of a portion of the residential rental facility occupied
by a [tenant] RESIDENT as the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S residence do not coincide with the
boundaries of a proposed unit, then, to the extent reasonable and practicable, the owner
shall offer in writing to that [tenant] RESIDENT the right to purchase a substantially
equivalent cooperative interest. The offer shall be at a price and on terms and conditions
at least as favorable as the price, terms, and conditions offered for the cooperative interest
which is coupled with the proprietary lease for that portion of the residential rental facility
to any other person and shall contain the statements required by paragraph (2) of
subsection (a) of this section.
(c) Unless written acceptance of an offer made under subsection (a) or (b) of this
section is first delivered to the owner by the [tenant] RESIDENT, the offer shall terminate,
without further act, upon the earlier to occur of:
(1) Termination of the lease by the [tenant] RESIDENT; or
(2) 60 days after the offer is delivered to the [tenant] RESIDENT.
(d) Acceptance of an offer by a [tenant] RESIDENT who meets the criteria for an

HOUSE BILL 1548
extended lease under § 5–6B–07 of this subtitle shall be contingent upon the [tenant]
RESIDENT not receiving an extended lease.
(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, if the offer
terminates, the owner may not offer to sell that cooperative interest at a price or on terms
and conditions more favorable to the offeree than the price, terms, and conditions offered
to the [tenant] RESIDENT during the 180–day period following the giving of the notice
required by § 5–6B–05 of this subtitle.
(2) The owner may reoffer to sell that cooperative interest to the [tenant]
RESIDENT on terms and conditions more favorable to the offeree, and if the owner does so,
the offer shall supersede the first offer.
(f) Within 75 days after the giving of the notice required by § 5–6B–05 of this
subtitle, the developer shall provide to any county, incorporated municipality, or housing
agency which has a right to purchase cooperative interests in the residential rental facility
under § 5–6B–09 of this subtitle a list of the names and units of all [tenants] RESIDENTS
who have validly accepted offers made under this section within 60 days of the giving of the
notice required by § 5–6B–05 of this subtitle, except those offers which have terminated
because of the granting of an extended lease under § 5–6B–07 of this subtitle.
5–6B–07.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Annual income” means the total income, from all sources, of a
designated household, for the income tax year immediately preceding the year in which the
notice is given under § 5–6B–05 of this subtitle, whether or not included in the definition
of gross income for federal or State tax purposes. For purposes of this section, the inclusions
and exclusions from annual income are the same as those listed in § 9–104(a)(8) of the Tax
– Property Article for “gross income” as that term is defined for the property tax credits for
homeowners by reason of income and age, reduced by unreimbursed medical expenses if
the [tenant] RESIDENT provides reasonable evidence of the unreimbursed medical
expenses or consents in writing to authorize disclosure of relevant information regarding
medical expense reimbursement at the time of applying for an extended lease.
(b) A developer may not sell a cooperative interest with respect to a unit in a
residential rental facility occupied by a member of a designated household entitled to
receive the notice required by § 5–6B–05 of this subtitle without offering to the [tenant]
RESIDENT of the unit a lease extension for a period of at least 3 years from the giving of
the notice required by § 5–6B–05 of this subtitle, if the household meets the following
criteria:
(1) Had an annual income which did not exceed the income eligibility figure
applicable for the county or standard metropolitan statistical area in which the residential
rental facility is located, as provided under subsection (n) of this section;

HOUSE BILL 1548 13
(2) Is current in its rent payment and has not violated any other material
terms of the lease;
(3) Has provided the developer within 60 days after the giving of the notice
required by § 5–6B–05 of this subtitle with an affidavit under penalty of perjury, with a
statement:
(i) Asserting that the household is applying for an extended lease
under this section;
(ii) Setting forth the household’s annual income for the calendar
year preceding the giving of the notice required by § 5–6B–05 of this subtitle, together with
reasonable supporting documentation of the household income and, where applicable, of
unreimbursed medical expenses or a written authorization for disclosure of relevant
information regarding medical expense reimbursement by doctors, hospitals, clinics,
insurance companies, or similar persons, entities, or organizations that provide medical
treatment coverage to the household; and
(iii) Setting forth facts showing that a member of the household is
either a handicapped citizen or a senior citizen who, in either event, has been a member of
the household for at least the 12 months immediately preceding the giving of the notice
required by § 5–6B–05 of this subtitle; and
(4) Has executed an extended lease and returned it to the developer within
60 days after the giving of the notice required by § 5–6B–05 of this subtitle.
(c) The developer shall deliver to each [tenant] RESIDENT entitled to receive the
notice required by § 5–6B–05 of this subtitle, simultaneously with the notice:
(1) An application on which may be included all of the information required
by paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of this section;
(2) A lease containing the terms required by this section and clearly
indicating that the lease will be effective, but only if:
(i) The [tenant] RESIDENT executes and returns the lease not later
than 60 days after the giving of the notice required by § 5–6B–05 of this subtitle; and
(ii) The household is allocated one of the units required to be made
available to qualified households based on its ranking under subsection (k) of this section
and the number of [tenants] RESIDENTS executing and returning leases;
(3) A copy of the public offering statement; and
(4) A notice setting forth the rights and obligations of the [tenant]
RESIDENT under this section. Delivery of a notice in the form specified in § 5–6B–05(f) of

HOUSE BILL 1548
this subtitle meets the requirements of this subsection.
(l) (1) If a conversion involves substantial rehabilitation or reconstruction of
such a nature that the work involved does not permit the continued occupancy of a unit
because of danger to the health and safety of the [tenants] RESIDENTS, any designated
household executing an extended lease under the provisions of this section shall be required
to vacate the unit not earlier than the expiration of the 180–day period and to relocate at
the expense of the developer in a comparable unit in the residential rental facility to permit
the work to be performed.
5–6B–08.
(c) The provisions of any local law or ordinance adopted under this section shall
not apply to the following transfers of a residential rental facility:
(4) A transfer of the interest of one [co–tenant] CO–RESIDENT to another
[co–tenant] CO–RESIDENT by operation of law or otherwise;
5–6B–09.
(a) (1) (I) A county or an incorporated municipality may provide by local
law or ordinance, that the cooperative interest with respect to a unit in a residential rental
facility occupied by a [tenant] RESIDENT entitled to receive the notice required by §
5–6B–05 of this subtitle may not be transferred unless the county, incorporated
municipality, or housing agency has first been offered in writing the right to purchase the
cooperative interest at the same price and on the same terms and conditions initially offered
to any other person.
(II) The local law or ordinance shall designate the title and mailing
address of the person to whom the offer to the county, incorporated municipality, or housing
agency is to be delivered and the title of the person who may accept the offer on behalf of
the county, incorporated municipality, or housing agency.
(2) (I) The local law or ordinance shall provide that the offer to the
county, incorporated municipality, or housing agency shall be made at the same time an
offer is made to a [tenant] RESIDENT of the unit under § 5–6B–06 of this subtitle.
(II) If a [tenant] RESIDENT accepts an offer of a unit made under §
5–6B–06 of this subtitle, then the rights of the county, incorporated municipality, or
housing agency to such unit under an offer made under this section, whether or not
accepted, shall terminate.
5–6B–10.
(a) (1) The intent of the General Assembly of Maryland is to facilitate the
orderly development of cooperative housing corporations in Maryland.

HOUSE BILL 1548 15
(2) The General Assembly recognizes, however, that the conversion of
residential rental facilities to cooperative housing corporations or condominiums can have
an adverse impact on the availability of rental units, resulting in the displacement of
[tenants] RESIDENTS.
(b) (1) A county or incorporated municipality may, by legislative finding,
recognize and declare that a rental housing emergency exists in all or a part of its
jurisdiction and has been caused by the conversion of residential rental facilities.
(2) Any legislative finding shall exist for one year, subject to any extensions
for periods of one year at a time.
(3) The jurisdiction shall consider and make findings as to:
[(1)] (I) The nature and incidence of conversions of residential rental
facilities;
[(2)] (II) The resulting hardship to and displacement of [tenants]
RESIDENTS; and
[(3)] (III) The scarcity of rental housing.
5–6B–33.
(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the notice
required by § 5–6B–05 of this subtitle shall be given to any [tenant] RESIDENT in
possession of any portion of a residential rental facility on or after January 1, 1987.
(2) The requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection do not apply to
nonresidential [tenants] RESIDENTS.
Article – Environment
6–801.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Change in occupancy” means a change of [tenant] RESIDENT in an affected
property in which the property is vacated and possession is either surrendered to the owner
or abandoned.
(s) “Relocation expenses” means all expenses necessitated by the relocation of a
[tenant’s] RESIDENTS household to lead–safe housing, including moving and hauling
expenses, the HEPA–vacuuming of all upholstered furniture, payment of a security deposit
for the lead–safe housing, and installation and connection of utilities and appliances.

HOUSE BILL 1548
(t) “Rent subsidy” means the difference between the rent paid by a [tenant]
RESIDENT for housing at the time a qualified offer is made under Part V of this subtitle
and the rent due for the lead–safe housing to which the [tenant] RESIDENT is relocated.
6–815.
(a) No later than the first change in occupancy in an affected property that occurs
on or after February 24, 1996, before the next [tenant] RESIDENT occupies the property,
an owner of an affected property shall initially satisfy the risk reduction standard
established under this subtitle by passing the test for lead–contaminated dust under §
6–816 of this subtitle provided that any chipping, peeling, or flaking paint has been
removed or repainted on:
(1) The exterior painted surfaces of the residential building in which the
rental dwelling unit is located; and
(2) The interior painted surfaces of the rental dwelling unit.
(b) At each change in occupancy thereafter, before the next [tenant] RESIDENT
occupies the property, the owner of an affected property shall satisfy the risk reduction
standard established under this subtitle by passing the test for lead–contaminated dust
under § 6–816 of this subtitle in accordance with subsection (a) of this section.
6–817.
(b) (2) (i) Notwithstanding any other remedy that may be available, an
owner who fails to meet the requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection and subsection
(c) of this section, or of § 6–819(f) of this subtitle shall lose the liability protection under §
6–836 of this subtitle for any alleged injury or loss caused by the ingestion of lead by a
person at risk that is first documented by a test for EBL of 15 µg/dl or more on or after
February 24, 2006 in any of the owner’s units that have not satisfied the risk reduction
standard specified in § 6–815(a) of this subtitle, the inspection requirement of subsection
(c) of this section, or the modified risk reduction standard specified in § 6–819(a) of this
subtitle, as applicable.
(ii) The liability protection under § 6–836 of this subtitle shall be
reinstated for any alleged injury or loss caused by the ingestion of lead that is first
documented by a test for EBL of 15 µg/dl or more after the date that the owner meets the
requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection, subsection (c) of this section, and the
requirements of § 6–819(f) of this subtitle.
(iii) The provisions of this paragraph do not apply if the owner proves
that the noncompliance results from:
1. A [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S lack of cooperation with the

HOUSE BILL 1548 17
owner’s compliance efforts; or
2. Legal action affecting access to the unit.
(3) Notice given under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be sent by:
(i) Certified mail, return receipt requested; or
(ii) A verifiable method approved by the Department.
6–818.
(a) (1) Any person performing lead–contaminated dust testing or conducting
inspections required by this subtitle:
(i) Shall be accredited by the Department;
(ii) May not be a related party to the owner; and
(iii) Shall submit a verified report of the result of the
lead–contaminated dust testing or visual inspection to the Department, the owner, and the
[tenant] RESIDENT, if any, of the affected property.
(2) An owner may not employ or engage a related party to the owner to
perform lead–contaminated dust testing or conduct inspections required by this subtitle.
6–819.
(b) (1) A [tenant] RESIDENT of an affected property may notify the owner of
the affected property of a defect in the affected property under this section in accordance
with this subsection.
(c) (1) After February 23, 1996, an owner of an affected property shall satisfy
the modified risk reduction standard:
(ii) Within 30 days after receipt of written notice from the [tenant]
RESIDENT, or from any other source, of:
1. A defect; and
2. The existence of a person at risk in the affected property.
(d) After May 23, 1997, an owner of an affected property shall satisfy the modified
risk reduction standard within 30 days after receipt of written notice from the [tenant]
RESIDENT, or from any other source, of a defect.

HOUSE BILL 1548
(e) An owner of an affected property is in compliance with subsection (c) or (d) of
this section if, as applicable:
(1) The owner satisfies the modified risk reduction within 30 days after
receiving a notice of elevated blood lead level or a notice of defect in accordance with this
section; or
(2) The owner provides for the temporary relocation of [tenants]
RESIDENTS to a lead–free dwelling unit or another dwelling unit that has satisfied the risk
reduction standard in accordance with § 6–815 of this subtitle within 30 days after the
receipt of a notice of elevated blood lead level or a notice of defect.
6–820.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, an owner of an affected
property shall give to the [tenant] RESIDENT of the affected property a notice, prepared by
the Department, of the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S rights under §§ 6–817 and 6–819 of this
subtitle, according to the following schedule:
(1) At least 25% of the owner’s affected properties by May 25, 1996;
(2) At least 50% of the owner’s affected properties by August 25, 1996;
(3) At least 75% of the owner’s affected properties by November 25, 1996;
and
(4) 100% of the owner’s affected properties by February 25, 1997.
(b) On or after February 24, 1996, an owner of an affected property shall give to
the [tenant] RESIDENT of the affected property a notice, prepared by the Department, of
the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S rights under §§ 6–817 and 6–819 of this subtitle upon the
execution of a lease or the inception of a tenancy.
(c) An owner of an affected property shall give to the [tenant] RESIDENT of the
affected property a notice, prepared by the Department, of the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S
rights under §§ 6–817 and 6–819 of this subtitle at least every 2 years after last giving the
notice to the [tenant] RESIDENT.
(d) The owner shall include, with the notice of the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S rights
that is provided to a [tenant] RESIDENT under this section upon the execution of a lease
or the inception of a tenancy, a copy of the current verified inspection certificate for the
affected property prepared under § 6–818 of this subtitle.
(e) (1) Notice given under this section shall be written, and shall be sent by:
(i) Certified mail, return receipt requested; or

HOUSE BILL 1548 19
(ii) A verifiable method approved by the Department.
(2) When giving notice to a [tenant] RESIDENT under this section, the
owner shall provide documentation of the notice to the Department in a manner acceptable
to the Department.
(3) A notice required to be given to a [tenant] RESIDENT under this section
shall be sent to a party or parties identified as the lessee in a written lease in effect for an
affected property or, if there is no written lease, the party or parties to whom the property
was rented.
(f) A person who has acquired, or will acquire, an affected property shall give the
notice required under this section to the [tenant] RESIDENT of the affected property:
(1) Before transfer of legal title; or
(2) Within 15 days following transfer of legal title.
6–821.
(a) (2) A [tenant] RESIDENT shall allow access to an affected property, at
reasonable times, to the owner to perform any work required under this subtitle.
(3) If a [tenant] RESIDENT must vacate an affected property for a period
of 24 hours or more in order to allow an owner to perform work that will disturb the paint
on interior surfaces, the owner shall pay the reasonable expenses that the [tenant]
RESIDENT incurs directly related to the required relocation.
(b) (1) If an owner has made all reasonable efforts to cause the [tenant]
RESIDENT to temporarily vacate an affected property in order to perform work that will
disturb the paint on interior surfaces, and the [tenant] RESIDENT refuses to vacate the
affected property, the owner may not be liable for any damages arising from the [tenant’s]
RESIDENT’S refusal to vacate.
(2) If an owner has made all reasonable efforts to gain access to an affected
property in order to perform any work required under this subtitle, and the [tenant]
RESIDENT refuses to allow access, even after receiving reasonable advance notice of the
need for access, the owner may not be liable for any damages arising from the [tenant’s]
RESIDENT’S refusal to allow access.
6–823.
(a) By May 23, 1996, an owner of an affected property shall give to the [tenant]
RESIDENT of each of the owner’s affected properties a lead poisoning information packet

HOUSE BILL 1548
prepared or designated by the Department.
(b) On or after February 24, 1996, upon the execution of a lease or the inception
of a tenancy for an affected property, the owner of the affected property shall give to the
[tenant] RESIDENT a lead poisoning information packet prepared or designated by the
Department.
(c) An owner of an affected property shall give to the [tenant] RESIDENT of the
affected property another copy of the lead poisoning information packet prepared or
designated by the Department at least every 2 years after last giving the information
packet to the [tenant] RESIDENT.
(d) A packet given to a [tenant] RESIDENT under this section shall be sent by:
(1) Certified mail, return receipt requested; or
(2) A verifiable method approved by the Department.
(e) The packet required to be given to a [tenant] RESIDENT under this section
shall be sent to a party or parties identified as the lessee in a written lease in effect for an
affected property or, if there is no written lease, the party or parties to whom the property
was rented.
(f) A person who has acquired, or will acquire, an affected property shall give the
packet required under this section to the [tenant] RESIDENT of the affected property:
(1) Before transfer of legal title; or
(2) Within 15 days following transfer of legal title.
6–825.
(f) A compliance plan for an occupied affected property under this section is void
unless within 15 days following transfer of the occupied affected property subject to the
compliance plan, the transferee files with the Department:
(2) A statement certifying that, prior to or within 15 days of transfer of
legal title, the transferee provided the tenants of the occupied properties with the notice of
[tenant’s] RESIDENT’S rights and lead poisoning information packet required by §§ 6–820
and 6–823 of this subtitle; and
6–828.
(a) This section applies to an owner of an affected property who has, with respect
to the affected property, complied with the applicable requirements of §§ 6–811, 6–812,
6–815, 6–817, and 6–819 of this subtitle, and has sent to the [tenant] RESIDENT the notices

HOUSE BILL 1548 21
required by §§ 6–820 and 6–823 of this subtitle.
6–836.
An owner of an affected property is not liable, for alleged injury or loss caused by
ingestion of lead by a person at risk in the affected property, to a person at risk or a parent,
legal guardian, or other person authorized under § 6–833 of this subtitle to respond on
behalf of a person at risk who rejects a qualified offer made by the owner or the owner’s
insurer or agent if, during the period of the alleged ingestion of lead by the person at risk,
and with respect to the affected property in which the exposure allegedly occurred, the
owner:
(1) Has given to the [tenant] RESIDENT the notices required by §§ 6–820
and 6–823 of this subtitle; and
(2) Was in compliance with:
(i) The registration provisions of Part III of this subtitle; and
(ii) The applicable risk reduction standard and response standard
under § 6–815 or § 6–819 of this subtitle, and the risk reduction schedule under § 6–817 of
this subtitle.
Article – Health – General
19–1401.1.
(a) (1) In addition to the requirements for licensure of a related institution as
provided in this title, an applicant for licensure of a nursing home shall include in the
application the identity of:
(i) Any person with an ownership interest in the nursing home; and
(ii) Any management company, [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER, or other business entity that will operate or contract with the applicant to manage
the nursing home.
Article – Housing and Community Development
4–1208.
(f) For rental housing financed from the Fund and owned or managed by a
housing authority, this subtitle supersedes:
(1) §§ 12–401, 12–402, and 12–405 of this article; and
(2) all other restrictions on [tenant] RESIDENT income under Division II

HOUSE BILL 1548
of this article.
Title 5. Office of [Tenant] RESIDENT and [Landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER
Affairs.
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Director” means the Director of the Office of [Tenant] RESIDENT and
[Landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER Affairs.
(c) “Office” means the Office of [Tenant] RESIDENT and [Landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER Affairs.
(d) (1) [“Tenant”] “RESIDENT” means [a residential tenant] AN INDIVIDUAL
OCCUPYING A RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY UNDER A LEASE AGREEMENT.
(2) [“Tenant”] “RESIDENT” includes:
(i) a [subtenant] SUBRESIDENT;
(ii) a lessee;
(iii) a sublessee; and
(iv) any other individual, other than an owner, who is entitled to the
possession or occupancy, or the benefits of possession or occupancy, of any residential rental
unit in the State.
5–102.
(a) There is an Office of [Tenant] RESIDENT and [Landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER Affairs in the Department.
(b) The purpose of the Office is to:
(1) ensure that [tenants] RESIDENTS have access to educational resources
to aid in understanding and exercising the [tenants’] RESIDENTS’ rights under State law;
(2) provide [tenants] RESIDENTS with information on how to report a
violation of their legal rights as [tenants] RESIDENTS and facilitate referrals of reported
violations to appropriate enforcement agencies;
(3) provide [tenants] RESIDENTS with information on how to obtain
financial counseling; and

HOUSE BILL 1548 23
(4) notify appropriate authorities regarding housing discrimination and
other unfair or illegal housing practices.
5–103.
(a) The Secretary shall appoint the Director of the Office.
(b) The Director:
(1) serves at the pleasure of the Secretary; and
(2) reports to the Secretary.
5–104.
(a) The Office shall:
(1) develop resources to aid [tenants] RESIDENTS in understanding and
exercising the legal rights of [tenants] RESIDENTS, including:
(i) a Maryland [Tenants’] RESIDENTS’ Bill of Rights, summarizing
the existing rights and remedies available to residential [tenants] RESIDENTS under State
and federal law; and
(ii) a publicly accessible website to provide access to the Maryland
[Tenants’] RESIDENTS’ Bill of Rights and other relevant informational resources;
(2) establish points of contact within the Office by which a [tenant]
RESIDENT may report a violation by a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER or a person
acting on behalf of a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER for referral to appropriate
enforcement agencies;
(3) provide resources to facilitate access by [tenants] RESIDENTS to credit
counseling;
(4) refer covered individuals, as defined in § 8–901 of the Real Property
Article, to the Access to Counsel in Evictions Program that is administered by the Maryland
Legal Services Corporation;
(5) collaborate with county and local governments that provide [tenant]
RESIDENT advocacy and assistance;
(6) receive notices and other documents related to a [tenant’s]
RESIDENT’S exclusive negotiation period and right of first refusal under § 8–119 of the
Real Property Article; and

HOUSE BILL 1548
(7) adopt regulations governing the content and delivery of notices for a
[tenant’s] RESIDENT’S exclusive negotiation period and right of first refusal under § 8–119
of the Real Property Article.
(b) The Office may:
(1) implement fair housing testing to ensure compliance by [landlords]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNERS with fair housing laws; and
(2) identify [landlords] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNERS that are out of
compliance with federal, State, or local law and facilitate referrals of cases to an
appropriate law enforcement agency or another appropriate agency.
(c) (1) On or before June 1 each year, the Office shall publish the Maryland
[Tenants’] RESIDENTS’ Bill of Rights on its website.
(2) The Maryland [Tenants’] RESIDENTS’ Bill of Rights shall include
contact information for the Office.
7–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) (2) “Project–based § 8 rental assistance” does not include rental assistance
made directly to a [tenant] RESIDENT under existing certificate or voucher programs.
(l) [“Tenant] “RESIDENT protection assistance” means payments to, and
extensions of leases for, the occupant or former occupant of an assisted unit in connection
with a protected action as required under § 7–212 of this title.
7–106.
This title does not reduce any obligation or right of a [tenant] RESIDENT, political
subdivision, or owner under Title 11 of the Real Property Article.
7–201.
(b) The owner shall give the notice of intent to:
(3) each [tenant] RESIDENT association that represents a rental unit in
the assisted project, if the [tenant] RESIDENT association has given the owner the title and
mailing address of a representative to receive the notice of intent;
7–202.

HOUSE BILL 1548 25
(a) A notice of intent, other than one sent to an assisted household, shall:
(4) give the information about the assisted project from the most recent
[tenant] RESIDENT recertification documents required by the United States Department
of Housing and Urban Development, the United States Department of Agriculture, or the
Department of Housing and Community Development on:
(i) the number of assisted households;
(ii) the number of assisted units by number of bedrooms;
(iii) the distribution of assisted households by race, gender, income,
and family size;
(iv) the number of households with elderly individuals or individuals
with disabilities; and
(v) the number of households with minors;
(b) A notice of intent sent to an assisted household shall contain:
(5) the name, address, and phone number of the owner’s agent to whom the
assisted household may apply for [tenant] RESIDENT protection assistance under this title;
and
7–203.
(a) An owner may not take a protected action unless the owner has provided all
[tenant] RESIDENT protection assistance required by this title.
7–210.
(b) In any rental housing project purchased under a right of first purchase under
this subtitle and owned or managed by a housing authority authorized under Division II of
this article, this subtitle supersedes:
(2) all otherwise applicable restrictions on [tenant] RESIDENT income
under Division II of this article.
7–212.
(a) An owner that gives notice of intent shall provide [tenant] RESIDENT
protection assistance under subsection (b) of this section unless:
(1) the owner has offered the right of first purchase in accordance with this
subtitle; and

HOUSE BILL 1548
(2) the assisted project is purchased by a party listed in § 7–204(a) of this
subtitle in conjunction with a protected action.
(b) [Tenant] RESIDENT protection assistance consists of:
(1) paying each assisted household $475 on or before the day that the
assisted household vacates the unit;
(2) reimbursing each assisted household for relocation expenses exceeding
$475 and up to $950, actually and reasonably incurred; and
(3) offering each assisted household that is current in its rent and has not
violated any other material term of its lease, a lease extension for at least 1 year from the
giving of the notice of intent.
7–215.
If an assisted project includes a unit occupied by a designated household and the
assisted project is sold or conveyed after a protected action:
(1) the provisions of this subtitle concerning extended leases continue to
apply despite the sale or conveyance;
(2) the new [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER shall provide each
designated household with written notice of the sale or conveyance; and
(3) on or before the execution of a contract of sale, the seller shall provide
the purchaser with written disclosure of each unit occupied by a designated household
subject to the provisions concerning extended leases for designated households.
7–301.
In connection with a protected action, each [tenant] RESIDENT shall cooperate with
the owner in providing information necessary to certify eligibility for housing subsidy
payments and in executing all necessary documents.
7–302.
(a) A [tenant] RESIDENT may not:
(1) waive or assign the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S rights under this title; or
(2) receive consideration to relinquish rights under this title.
7–303.

HOUSE BILL 1548 27
If a new [tenant] RESIDENT moves into an assisted unit after a notice of intent is
given, the owner shall give the new [tenant] RESIDENT written notice that:
(1) sets forth any rent increase that the owner plans after the protected
action; and
(2) states that the new [tenant] RESIDENT will not be entitled to [tenant]
RESIDENT protection assistance.
7–304.
Before taking a protected action, an owner may not terminate without cause the
leasehold interest of a [tenant] RESIDENT occupying an assisted unit to avoid the owner’s
obligations under this title.
7–305.
(a) In this section, “excess rent” means rent that exceeds the rent payable by a
[tenant] RESIDENT under the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S lease as of the date of the notice of
intent, adjusted as allowed under § 7–212(c) of this title.
7–306.
(a) In connection with a protected action, an owner:
(1) may not terminate or alter the terms and conditions of a lease entered
into before the effective date of the protected action;
(2) may not interfere with the efforts of individual [tenants] RESIDENTS
to obtain housing subsidies or other public assistance;
(3) may not discriminate based on source of income or receipt of a housing
subsidy;
(4) may not interfere with the rights of a [tenant] RESIDENT to occupy an
assisted unit under an existing lease or applicable federal, State, or local law; and
(5) shall cooperate with a [tenant] RESIDENT to execute all necessary
documents to enable the payment of housing subsidies to or for the [tenant] RESIDENT.
(b) If the owner has interfered with a [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S application for a
housing subsidy or other public assistance, the nonpayment of any amount of rent for an
assisted unit in excess of 30% of the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S income is not grounds for the
owner to terminate the lease or sue for possession of the leased property.
7–403.

HOUSE BILL 1548
A violation of this title is within the scope of the enforcement duties and powers of
the Division of Consumer Protection of the Office of the Attorney General under Title 13 of
the Commercial Law Article, if the violation results in:
(1) displacement of a [tenant] RESIDENT or former [tenant] RESIDENT
from an assisted unit;
(2) increased rents for a [tenant] RESIDENT or former [tenant] RESIDENT
of an assisted unit; or
(3) another violation of the rights of a [tenant] RESIDENT or former
[tenant] RESIDENT of an assisted unit.
12–303.
(d) This subtitle does not bar a [tenant] RESIDENT of a housing project or of
property included or planned to be included in a housing project from being a commissioner
of an authority.
12–402.
Except for rental units that may be occupied by others under § 12–503(a)(4) of this
title, an authority:
(1) shall rent the housing units in a housing project only:
(i) to persons of eligible income, except for a reasonable number of
housing units that may be occupied by management and security personnel; and
(ii) at rentals within the financial reach of persons of eligible income;
(2) may not accept a person as a [tenant] RESIDENT in a housing project
if the aggregate annual income of the person or persons who would occupy the housing unit
exceeds the maximum income level established for persons of eligible income; and
(3) shall prohibit subletting by [tenants] RESIDENTS.
13–104.
(a) (2) Of the seven Commissioners:
(i) one shall be a [tenant] RESIDENT of an Annapolis Authority
property other than an Annapolis Authority property for seniors; and
(ii) one shall be a [tenant] RESIDENT of an Annapolis Authority

HOUSE BILL 1548 29
property for seniors.
Article – Human Services
5–603.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Delinquent [tenant”] RESIDENT” means a [tenant] RESIDENT of
public housing who is 30 or more days delinquent in paying the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S full
monthly rent to a public housing authority.
(3) “Public housing” means a dwelling unit owned, leased, or managed by
a public housing authority.
(4) “Public housing authority” means a public corporation created under
Division II of the Housing and Community Development Article or the public corporation’s
designee.
(b) If a recipient of temporary cash assistance is a delinquent [tenant]
RESIDENT, the Administration, at the request of the public housing authority, shall:
(1) deduct the amount of the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S rent from the
[tenant’s] RESIDENT’S monthly assistance payments each month;
(2) pay the amount deducted from the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S monthly
assistance payments to the public housing authority or the public housing authority’s
authorized agent; and
(3) forward the remaining amount of the monthly assistance payments to
the [tenant] RESIDENT.
(c) (1) If a court establishes an escrow account under § 8–211 of the Real
Property Article or a parallel provision of public local law for a tenancy covered under
subsection (b) of this section, the public housing authority shall notify the Administration
of the court action.
(2) On notice under paragraph (1) of this subsection or on certification by
an attorney of record representing the delinquent [tenant] RESIDENT in the court action
that an order has been issued to establish an escrow account, the Administration shall pay
rent to the court as long as the order is in effect.
(3) Any notice under paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection shall include
a list of all addresses covered by the court action.
(4) The public housing authority shall notify the Administration when the

HOUSE BILL 1548
court action has been resolved.
Article – Public Safety
9–104.
(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, smoke alarm placement in
a one– or two–family dwelling shall be upgraded to comply with paragraph (3) of this
subsection in existing residential occupancies when any one of the following occurs:
(iii) there is a change of [tenant] RESIDENT in a residential unit and
the residential unit has not previously been equipped in accordance with this subtitle with
sealed long–life battery smoke alarms with silence/hush button features within the 10
years preceding the change of [tenant] RESIDENT; or
9–105.
(b) (1) On written request on behalf of a [tenant] RESIDENT who is deaf or
hard of hearing, a sleeping room occupied by a deaf or hard of hearing individual shall be
provided with an approved notification appliance designed to alert deaf or hard of hearing
individuals.
(2) The [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER shall provide a
notification appliance that, when activated, provides a signal that is sufficient to warn the
deaf or hard of hearing [tenant] RESIDENT in those sleeping rooms.
(f) A [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER may require reimbursement from
a [tenant] RESIDENT for the cost of a smoke alarm required under this section.
9–106.
(c) The [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER or property owner is responsible
for the installation, repair, maintenance, and replacement of smoke alarms required by this
subtitle.
(e) (1) Testing of smoke alarms is the responsibility of the occupant of the
residential unit.
(2) (i) A [tenant] RESIDENT shall notify the [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER in writing of the failure or malfunction of a required smoke alarm.
(ii) The written notification required under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph shall be delivered by certified mail, return receipt requested to the [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER, or by hand delivery to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER or the [landlord’s] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER’S agent, at the address used for
the payment of rent.

HOUSE BILL 1548 31
(iii) If the delivery of the notification is made by hand as described in
subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER or the
[landlord’s] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER’S agent shall provide to the [tenant] RESIDENT
a written receipt for the delivery.
(iv) The [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER shall provide
written acknowledgment of the notification and shall repair or replace the smoke alarm
within 5 calendar days after the notification.
9–108.
(a) If the State Fire Marshal or other designated authority with jurisdiction finds
the absence of operating, required smoke detectors, the State Fire Marshal or other
authority shall issue a smoke alarm installation order to the responsible [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER, owner, or occupant.
12–202.
(j) (2) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, an occupant, a dependent of
an occupant, or a prospective [tenant] RESIDENT who otherwise meets the requirements
for tenancy may commence a civil action in the District Court or circuit court to obtain relief
for a violation of the Maryland Accessibility Code with regard to a building of four or more
dwelling units that:
(i) is subject to the Maryland Accessibility Code; but
(ii) is not a historic property.
(3) At least 30 days before filing a complaint under this subsection, an
occupant, a dependent of an occupant, or a prospective [tenant] RESIDENT who otherwise
meets the requirements for tenancy shall provide written notice to the property manager,
[landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER, or rental agent that:
(i) states that the occupant, dependent of an occupant, or
prospective [tenant] RESIDENT who otherwise meets the requirements for tenancy needs
accessibility;
(ii) identifies the location of the multifamily building that is alleged
to be noncompliant; and
(iii) states that the owner of the multifamily building has 30 days
from the date of the notice to make arrangements to bring the multifamily building into
compliance.
12–203.

HOUSE BILL 1548
(g) (1) On application of the property owner, a political subdivision may waive
the applicability of the Minimum Livability Code to a unit of rental housing if:
(i) each [tenant] RESIDENT of the unit is given adequate notice in
the form and manner specified by the political subdivision;
(ii) each [tenant] RESIDENT is given an opportunity to comment on
the application in writing or in person; and
(iii) the waiver would not threaten the health or safety of any
[tenant] RESIDENT.
(2) A political subdivision may waive applicability of the Minimum
Livability Code if the waiver is granted on the basis of the religious practices of the [tenant]
RESIDENT of a unit of rental housing.
14–212.
(b) (2) The court need not stay the action if the court finds that the ability of a
[tenant] RESIDENT to pay the agreed rent was not materially affected because the [tenant]
RESIDENT was a person in emergency management service or person suffering injury or
damage.
Article – Public Utilities
7–224.
(e) For weatherization of leased or rented residences, the Department shall adopt
regulations to ensure that:
(1) the benefits of weatherization assistance, including utility bill
reduction and preservation of affordable housing stock, accrue primarily to low–income
[tenants] RESIDENTS occupying a leased or rented residence; and
(2) the rent on the residence is not increased and the [tenant] RESIDENT
is not evicted as a result of weatherization provided under this section.
7–303.
(h) (1) A complaint by an occupant of a dwelling unit or commercial rental unit
against an owner, operator, or manager of an apartment house, office building, or shopping
center under this section may be filed in the county or municipal corporation where the
apartment house, office building, or shopping center is located.
(2) A complaint filed under paragraph (1) of this subsection may be

HOUSE BILL 1548 33
handled by:
(i) the [landlord–tenant] RESIDENTIAL HOUSING
OWNER–RESIDENT commission, if one exists, of the county or municipal corporation;
(ii) the consumer protection agency, if one exists, of the county or
municipal corporation if there is not a [landlord–tenant] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER–RESIDENT commission in the county or municipal corporation;
(iii) the Consumer Protection Division of the Office of the Attorney
General, if there is not a consumer protection agency in the county or municipal
corporation; or
(iv) any other State or local government unit or office designated to
handle [tenants’] RESIDENTS’ complaints.
(i) This section does not affect the right of an owner, operator, or manager of an
apartment house, office building, or shopping center to redistribute gas or electricity to
[tenants] RESIDENTS or occupants.
7–304.
(b) (2) An energy allocation system may not be used for direct billing of energy
costs to the [tenant] RESIDENT of an individual dwelling unit unless the Commission
approves the system in accordance with this subsection.
7–307.3.
(b) As a term of a lease of a multifamily dwelling unit, the property owner or
property manager of the multifamily dwelling unit may require a [tenant] RESIDENT to
ensure that a customer of the public service company that is responsible for the account for
that multifamily dwelling unit provides consent for the property owner or property
manager to receive a notice of termination of services as a result of nonpayment by the
customer.
7–309.
(a) This section does not apply to electric cooperatives.
(b) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Affected dwelling unit” means a dwelling unit, as defined in § 7–303 of
this subtitle, where the utility service:
(i) is in the [landlord’s] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER’S name;

HOUSE BILL 1548
(ii) is delivered through a single meter to a single dwelling unit; and
(iii) does not use a master meter.
(3) “Co–occupant” means two or more adults who occupy the same dwelling
unit as their primary domicile or legal residence within the State.
(4) [“Landlord”] “RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER” means an owner of an
affected dwelling unit who leases the affected dwelling unit to a tenant.
(5) [“Tenant”] “RESIDENT” means an occupant of an affected dwelling
unit who:
(i) has a valid oral or written lease to reside in the affected dwelling
unit; and
(ii) is not a co–occupant with the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER in the affected dwelling unit.
(6) “Utility service” means gas or electric service provided to an affected
dwelling unit by a public service company that is regulated by the Commission.
(7) “Utility service provider” means a public service company that:
(i) provides gas or electric service; and
(ii) is regulated by the Commission.
(c) If utility service at an affected dwelling unit is subject to the threat of
termination or actual termination, a [tenant] RESIDENT residing in the affected dwelling
unit:
(1) may apply for a new utility service account in the [tenant’s]
RESIDENT’S name; and
(2) may not incur liability for charges due on the [landlord’s] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER’S account.
(d) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, when a [tenant]
RESIDENT applies for a new utility service account under subsection (c)(1) of this section,
a utility service provider shall establish a new utility service account for the affected
dwelling unit in the name of the [tenant] RESIDENT if the [tenant] RESIDENT meets the
requirements of all applicable laws, regulations, and tariffs.
(2) A utility service provider may, in accordance with applicable laws,
regulations, and tariffs, require a [tenant] RESIDENT to pay a deposit and past due

HOUSE BILL 1548 35
balances from previous accounts in the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S name before establishing a
new utility service account in the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S name.
(3) A utility service provider may not refuse or otherwise condition a
[tenant’s] RESIDENT’S ability to establish a new utility service account in the [tenant’s]
RESIDENT’S name because of arrearages on the [landlord’s] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER’S account.
(e) Notwithstanding any other law governing the protection of customer
information, if the billing address for a utility service account is different from the service
address for the same utility service account and a utility service provider sends a
termination notice to the billing address, the utility service provider shall:
(1) send a termination notice to the service address by first–class mail or
post a termination notice in a conspicuous location at the service address at least 14 days
before terminating utility service to the affected dwelling unit;
(2) ensure that the notice contains:
(i) the earliest date that service will be terminated; and
(ii) the telephone number the [tenant] RESIDENT may call to obtain
further information;
(3) address the notice to “All Occupants”; and
(4) enclose the notice in an envelope that states on the address side, in bold,
capitalized letters in at least 12–point type, the following: “IMPORTANT NOTICE TO ALL
OCCUPANTS: UTILITY TERMINATION PENDING”.
(f) If the billing address for a utility service account is the same as the service
address for the same utility service account and the utility service provider sends a
termination notice, the notice shall be enclosed in an envelope, the address side of which
shall have a written notice stating in bold, capitalized letters in at least 12–point type, the
following: “IMPORTANT NOTICE TO ALL OCCUPANTS: UTILITY TERMINATION
PENDING”.
(g) A [tenant] RESIDENT may deduct from rent due to a [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER the amount of payments made to a utility service provider in
accordance with § 8–212.3 of the Real Property Article.
(h) In a rate proceeding filed under Title 4, Subtitle 2 of this article, the
Commission shall authorize the full and timely cost recovery of a utility service provider’s
prudently incurred costs arising from its obligations under this section.
Article – Real Property

HOUSE BILL 1548
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated unless
otherwise apparent from context.
(b) “County” includes Baltimore City.
(c) “Deed” includes any deed, grant, mortgage, deed of trust, lease, assignment,
and release, pertaining to land or property or any interest therein or appurtenant thereto,
including an interest in rents and profits from rents.
(d) (1) “Deed of trust” means a deed of trust that secures a debt or the
performance of an obligation.
(2) “Deed of trust” does not include a voluntary grant unrelated to security
purposes.
(e) “Grant” includes conveyance, assignment, and transfer.
(f) “Land” means property.
(g) “Land record” means any document recorded by a clerk of the circuit court
relating to property.
(h) (1) “Landlord” means any landlord[, including a lessor].
(2) “LANDLORD” INCLUDES:
(I) A LESSOR; AND
(II) A RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER.
(i) “Lease” means any oral or written agreement, express or implied, creating a
landlord and tenant OR RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER AND RESIDENT relationship,
including any sublease and any further sublease.
(j) “Mortgage” means any mortgage, including a deed in the nature of mortgage.
(k) “Person” includes an individual, a receiver, a trustee, a guardian, an executor,
an administrator, a fiduciary, or a representative of any kind, or any partnership, firm,
association, public or private corporation, or any other entity.
(l) “Property” means real property or any interest in real property.
(m) “Purchaser” means a buyer or vendee.

HOUSE BILL 1548 37
(N) “RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER” MEANS A PERSON WHO LEASES
RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY TO A RESIDENT.
(O) “RESIDENT” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO LEASES RESIDENTIAL
PROPERTY FROM A RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER.
[(n)] (P) (1) “Tenant” means any tenant [including a lessee].
(2) “TENANT” INCLUDES:
(I) A LESSEE; AND
(II) A RESIDENT.
[(o)] (Q) “Vendor” means a seller.
8–119.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(5) “Residential rental property” means a [tenant–occupied]
RESIDENT–OCCUPIED rental property for residential use with three or fewer individual
dwelling units.
(7) [“Tenant”] “RESIDENT” means an individual who has occupied a
residential rental property for at least 6 months and who is a named lessee in the written
lease.
(8) [“Tenant’s] “RESIDENT’S exclusive negotiation period” means the
period of time after a [tenant] RESIDENT is notified about the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S right
to purchase the residential rental property during which the [tenant] RESIDENT may
negotiate exclusively with the owner to enter into a contract of sale.
(c) (1) Before a residential rental property may be offered for sale to the public
or a third party, including through a listing for sale, the owner of the property shall send
each [tenant] RESIDENT a written notice of the [tenant’s] TENANT’S right to deliver an
offer to purchase the property.
(2) The written notice required under paragraph (1) of this subsection
shall:
(i) Be in the form specified in regulations adopted by the Secretary;
(ii) Be delivered by:

HOUSE BILL 1548
1. First class mail with a certificate of mailing; or
2. A delivery service providing delivery tracking and
confirmation;
(iii) Contain material terms that the owner would agree to
incorporate in a resulting contract of sale with the [tenant] RESIDENT;
(iv) State, in a conspicuous manner, that the notice is a solicitation
of an offer to purchase and is not intended as and may not be construed as a binding
contract of sale; and
(v) State any information regarding deadlines for the [tenant]
RESIDENT to submit an offer to purchase, including the duration of the [tenant’s]
RESIDENT’S exclusive negotiation period.
(3) The owner shall send a copy of the notice required under paragraph (1)
of this subsection to the Office of [Tenant] RESIDENT and [Landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER Affairs in accordance with regulations established by the Secretary.
(4) (i) Within 30 days after the landlord delivers the notice under
paragraph (1) of this subsection, the [tenant] RESIDENT may deliver to the owner a written
offer to purchase the property.
(ii) Within 5 days after the owner receives the offer to purchase the
property from the [tenant] RESIDENT, the owner shall:
1. If the offer contains the same or more favorable material
terms as those contained in the notice, accept the offer and notify the Office of [Tenant]
RESIDENT and [Landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER Affairs; or
2. If the offer contains material terms that deviate from the
terms of the notice, deliver a counteroffer to the [tenant] RESIDENT with an explanation
of how the offer deviates from the notice.
(iii) If more than one [tenant] RESIDENT or group of [tenants]
RESIDENTS delivers a timely offer to purchase the property, the owner may select the more
favorable offer without liability to any other [tenant] RESIDENT.
(iv) 1. A [tenant] RESIDENT or group of [tenants] RESIDENTS
may affirmatively decline an offer of sale by an owner at any time before an offer of
purchase is required to be delivered to the owner under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
2. A landlord that receives notice from a [tenant] RESIDENT
or group of [tenants] RESIDENTS under subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph may offer

HOUSE BILL 1548 39
the property for sale.
(5) (i) Within 5 days after the [tenant] RESIDENT receives a
counteroffer from the owner under paragraph (4)(ii)2 of this subsection, the [tenant]
RESIDENT may:
1. Accept the counteroffer; or
2. Reject the counteroffer.
(ii) If the [tenant] RESIDENT fails to respond to the counteroffer
within 5 days after receipt of the counteroffer, the counteroffer is deemed to be rejected and
the owner shall notify the Office of [Tenant] RESIDENT and [Landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER Affairs.
(6) A [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S right of first refusal under subsection (d) of
this section is terminated and the owner shall notify the Office of [Tenant] RESIDENT and
[Landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER Affairs if the [tenant] RESIDENT does not:
(i) Deliver an offer to purchase in accordance with paragraph (3) of
this subsection; or
(ii) Accept a counteroffer in accordance with paragraph (4) of this
subsection.
(7) Material terms for the purchase of a residential rental property under
this subsection:
(i) Shall be commercially reasonable and made in good faith, and
shall adhere to generally accepted residential real estate practices; and
(ii) May not include restrictions on financing methods or the right of
inspection.
(d) (1) (i) Before a voluntary transfer of title to a residential rental
property may occur, any [tenant] RESIDENT or group of [tenants] RESIDENT of the
property, as applicable, shall have the right of first refusal to purchase the property in
accordance with the requirements of this subsection.
(ii) The right of a third party to purchase any residential rental
property to which the requirements of this section apply is subject to the exercise of the
right of first refusal by a [tenant] RESIDENT or group of [tenants] RESIDENTS.
(2) A [tenant] RESIDENT has a right of first refusal to purchase residential
rental property if:

HOUSE BILL 1548
(i) The owner intends to accept an offer from a third party to
purchase the property for an amount that is at least 10% lower than the lowest price offered
to the [tenant] RESIDENT in any previous notice, offer, or counteroffer under subsection
(c) of this section; or
(ii) The owner, without having offered the property for sale to the
public or any third party, receives an offer to purchase the property from a third party.
(3) (i) If the owner receives an offer to purchase the property from a
third party as described in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the owner may not accept the
offer until:
1. The owner provides written notice to the [tenant]
RESIDENT of the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S right of first refusal; and
2. The [tenant] RESIDENT has an opportunity to exercise
the right of first refusal within 30 days after receipt of the notice specified in paragraph
(4)(i) of this subsection.
(ii) The written notice of the right of first refusal to the [tenant]
RESIDENT shall:
1. Be in the form specified in regulations by the Secretary;
2. Be delivered by:
A. First class mail with a certificate of mailing; or
B. A delivery service providing delivery tracking and
confirmation;
3. Contain the same sales price as the third–party offer to
purchase;
4. State, in a conspicuous manner, that the notice is a
solicitation of an offer to purchase and is not intended as and may not be construed as a
binding contract of sale; and
5. State any information regarding deadlines for the [tenant]
RESIDENT to submit an offer to purchase.
(iii) The owner shall send a copy of the notice to the Office of [Tenant]
RESIDENT and [Landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER Affairs in accordance with
regulations established by the Secretary.
(4) (i) Within 30 days after receipt of the notice under paragraph (3) of

HOUSE BILL 1548 41
this subsection, the [tenant] RESIDENT may deliver to the owner a written offer to
purchase the property.
(ii) If a [tenant] RESIDENT delivers an offer to purchase at the same
sales price as the offer from the third party, the owner shall accept the offer from the
[tenant] RESIDENT and notify the Office of [Tenant] RESIDENT and [Landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER Affairs.
(iii) If more than one [tenant] RESIDENT or group of [tenants
RESIDENTS delivers a timely offer to purchase the property, the owner may select the more
favorable offer without liability to any other [tenant] RESIDENT.
(5) If a [tenant] RESIDENT does not deliver an offer to purchase the
property in accordance with paragraph (4) of this subsection:
(i) The owner may accept the third–party offer;
(ii) The [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S right of first refusal shall be
considered waived; and
(iii) The owner shall notify the Office of [Tenant] RESIDENT and
[Landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER Affairs.
(6) If the owner accepts the offer to purchase from the [tenant] RESIDENT
under paragraph (4) of this subsection and enters into a contract of sale, but the contract
is terminated before settlement, the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S right of first refusal is waived
and the owner shall notify the Office of [Tenant] RESIDENT and [Landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER Affairs.
(7) If a third party delivers an offer to purchase to the owner, the owner
shall notify the third party of a [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S right of first refusal under this
subsection.
(e) This section may not be construed to prohibit:
(1) An individual from submitting an offer to purchase a property leased
by the individual that is offered for sale to the public; or
(2) Multiple [tenants] RESIDENTS of a residential property from jointly
delivering an offer to purchase or from jointly contracting to purchase the property.
(f) The rights of a [tenant] RESIDENT under this section may not be waived or
assigned and any attempted waiver or assignment is void.
(g) This section preempts any local law or ordinance governing the right of first

HOUSE BILL 1548
refusal or opportunity to purchase of a jurisdiction or [tenant] RESIDENT for the purchase
of a residential rental property.
(h) (1) Following closing on a contract of sale between an owner and a third
party, liability for failure to comply with this section is restricted to the owner and may not
attach to the residential rental property that is the subject of the contract.
(2) (i) A [tenant] RESIDENT who brings an action against the owner
after closing on a contract of sale for failing to provide the notice required by this section
may not file a notice of lis pendens under Maryland Rule 12–102.
(ii) A court may dismiss a wrongfully filed action of lis pendens
under this paragraph.
8–202.
(a) For the purposes of this section, a “lease option agreement” means any clause
in a lease agreement or separate document that confers on the [tenant] RESIDENT some
power, either qualified or unqualified, to purchase the [landlord’s] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER’S interest in the property.
(b) (1) A lease option agreement to purchase improved residential property,
with or without a ground rent:
(i) If executed after July 1, 1971, shall contain the following
statement in capital letters: “THIS IS NOT A CONTRACT TO BUY.”; and
(ii) If executed on or after July 1, 2018, shall also contain the
following statement in capital letters and in close proximity to the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S
signature line:
“THIS AGREEMENT IS AN INTEGRAL PART OF YOUR LEASE AND IS GOVERNED
BY TITLE 8 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE OF THE ANNOTATED CODE OF
MARYLAND AND A [TENANT] RESIDENT OR PROSPECTIVE [TENANT] RESIDENT
SHALL HAVE ALL APPLICABLE RIGHTS AND REMEDIES PROVIDED UNDER THAT
TITLE.”
(2) In addition, the agreement shall contain a clear statement of its
purpose and effect with respect to the ultimate purchase of the property which is the subject
of the lease option.
(c) If a lease option agreement fails to comply with subsection (b) of this section
and is otherwise enforceable, the lease, the lease option agreement, or both may be voided
at the option of the party that did not draft the lease option agreement.
8–203.

HOUSE BILL 1548 43
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
[(2) “Landlord” means a landlord or a prospective landlord.]
(2) “RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER” MEANS A LANDLORD OR A
PROSPECTIVE LANDLORD OF RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY.
(3) “RESIDENT” MEANS A TENANT OR A PROSPECTIVE TENANT OF
RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY.
[(3)] (4) “Security deposit” means any payment of money, including
payment of the last month’s rent in advance of the time it is due, given to a [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER by a [tenant] RESIDENT in order to protect the [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER against nonpayment of rent, damage due to breach of lease,
or damage to the leased premises, common areas, major appliances, and furnishings.
[(4) “Tenant” means a tenant or a prospective tenant.]
(b) (1) A [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER may not impose a security
deposit in excess of the equivalent of two months’ rent per dwelling unit, regardless of the
number of [tenants] RESIDENTS.
(2) A [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER may impose a security
deposit in an amount equivalent to up to 2 months’ rent if:
(i) The [tenant] RESIDENT is eligible and has qualified for utility
assistance through the Department of Human Services;
(ii) The lease agreement requires that the [tenant] RESIDENT make
payments for utility services directly to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER; and
(iii) The [tenant] RESIDENT and [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER agree in writing to the amount of the security deposit.
(3) If a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER violates paragraph (1) of
this subsection, the [tenant] RESIDENT may recover up to three times the extra amount
charged, plus reasonable attorney’s fees.

(4) An action under this section may be brought at any time during the
tenancy or within 2 years after its termination.
(c) (1) The [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER shall give the [tenant]
RESIDENT a receipt for the security deposit as specified in § 8–203.1 of this subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 1548
(2) The receipt shall be included in a written lease.
(d) (1) (i) The [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER shall maintain all
security deposits in federally insured financial institutions, as defined in §
1–101 of the Financial Institutions Article, which do business in the State.
(ii) Security deposit accounts shall be maintained in branches of the
financial institutions which are located within the State and the accounts shall be devoted
exclusively to security deposits and bear interest.
(iii) A security deposit shall be deposited in an account within 30 days
after the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER receives it.
(iv) The aggregate amount of the accounts shall be sufficient in
amount to equal all security deposits for which the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER
is liable.
(2) (i) [In lieu] INSTEAD of the accounts described in paragraph (1) of
this subsection, the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER may hold the security deposits
in insured certificates of deposit at branches of federally insured financial institutions, as
defined in § 1–101 of the Financial Institutions Article, located in the State or in securities
issued by the federal government or the State of Maryland.
(ii) In the aggregate certificates of deposit or securities shall be
sufficient in amount to equal all security deposits for which the [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER is liable.
(3) (i) In the event of sale or transfer of the [landlord’s] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER’S interest in the leased premises, including receivership or
bankruptcy, the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER or the [landlord’s] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER’S estate, but not the managing agent or court appointed receiver, shall
remain liable to the [tenant] RESIDENT and the transferee for maintenance of the security
deposit as required by law, and the withholding and return of the security deposit plus
interest as required by law, as to all or any portion of the security deposit that the
[landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER fails to deliver to the transferee together with an
accounting showing the amount and date of the original deposit, the records of the interest
rates applicable to the security deposit, if any, and the name and last known address of the
[tenant] RESIDENT from whom, or on whose behalf, the deposit was received.
(ii) A security deposit under this section may not be attached by
creditors of the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER or of the [tenant] RESIDENT.
(4) Any successor in interest is liable to the [tenant] RESIDENT for failure
to return the security deposit, together with interest, as provided in this section.
(e) (1) Within 45 days after the end of the tenancy, the [landlord] RENTAL

HOUSE BILL 1548 45
PROPERTY OWNER shall return the security deposit to the [tenant] RESIDENT together
with simple interest which has accrued at the daily U.S. Treasury yield curve rate for 1
year, as of the first business day of each year, or 1.5% a year, whichever is greater, less any
damages rightfully withheld.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph,
interest shall accrue at monthly intervals from the day the [tenant] RESIDENT gives the
[landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER the security deposit. Interest is not compounded.
(ii) No interest is due or payable:
1. Unless the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER has
held the security deposit for at least 6 months; or
2. For any period less than a full month.
(3) Interest shall be payable only on security deposits of $50 or more.
(4) If the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER, without a reasonable
basis, fails to return any part of the security deposit, plus accrued interest, within 45 days
after the termination of the tenancy, the [tenant] RESIDENT has an action of up to
threefold of the withheld amount, plus reasonable attorney’s fees.
(f) (1) (i) The security deposit, or any portion thereof, may be withheld for
unpaid rent, damage due to breach of lease or for damage by the [tenant] RESIDENT or the
[tenant’s] RESIDENT’S family, agents, employees, guests or invitees in excess of ordinary
wear and tear to the leased premises, common areas, major appliances, and furnishings
owned by the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER.
(ii) The [tenant] RESIDENT has the right to be present when the
[landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER or the [landlord’s] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER’S
agent inspects the premises in order to determine if any damage was done to the premises,
if the [tenant] RESIDENT notifies the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER by certified
mail of the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S intention to move, the date of moving, and the [tenant’s]
RESIDENT’S new address.
(iii) The notice to be furnished by the [tenant] RESIDENT to the
[landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER shall be mailed at least 15 days prior to the date
of moving.
(iv) Upon receipt of the notice, the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER shall notify the [tenant] RESIDENT by certified mail of the time and date when
the premises are to be inspected.
(v) The date of inspection shall occur within five days before or five

HOUSE BILL 1548
days after the date of moving as designated in the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S notice.
(vi) The [tenant] RESIDENT shall be advised of the [tenant’s]
RESIDENT’S rights under this subsection in writing at the time of the [tenant’s]
RESIDENT’S payment of the security deposit.
(vii) Failure by the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER to comply
with this requirement forfeits the right of the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER to
withhold any part of the security deposit for damages.
(2) The security deposit is not liquidated damages and may not be forfeited
to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER for breach of the rental agreement, except
in the amount that the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER is actually damaged by the
breach.
(3) In calculating damages for lost future rents any amount of rents
received by the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER for the premises during the
remainder if any, of the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S term, shall reduce the damages by a like
amount.
(g) (1) If any portion of the security deposit is withheld, the [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER shall present by first–class mail directed to the last known
address of the [tenant] RESIDENT, within 45 days after the termination of the tenancy, a
written list of the damages claimed under subsection (f)(1) of this section together with a
statement of the cost actually incurred.
(2) If the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER fails to comply with this
requirement, the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER forfeits the right to withhold any
part of the security deposit for damages.
(h) (1) The provisions of subsections (e)(1) and (4) and (g)(1) and (2) of this
section are inapplicable to a [tenant] RESIDENT who has been evicted or ejected for breach
of a condition or covenant of a lease prior to the termination of the tenancy or who has
abandoned the premises prior to the termination of the tenancy.
(2) (i) A [tenant] RESIDENT specified in paragraph (1) of this
subsection may demand return of the security deposit by giving written notice by
first–class mail to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER within 45 days of being
evicted or ejected or of abandoning the premises.
(ii) The notice shall specify the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S new address.
(iii) Subject to subsection (j) of this section, the [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER, within 45 days of receipt of such notice, shall present, by first–class
mail to the [tenant] RESIDENT, a written list of the damages claimed under subsection

HOUSE BILL 1548 47
(f)(1) of this section together with a statement of the costs actually incurred and shall return
to the [tenant] RESIDENT the security deposit together with simple interest which has
accrued at the daily U.S. Treasury yield curve rate for 1 year, as of the first business day
of each year, or 1.5% a year, whichever is greater, less any damages rightfully withheld.
(3) (i) If a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER fails to send the list
of damages required by paragraph (2) of this subsection, the right to withhold any part of
the security deposit for damages is forfeited.
(ii) If a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER fails to return the
security deposit as required by paragraph (2) of this subsection, the [tenant] RESIDENT
has an action of up to threefold of the withheld amount, plus reasonable attorney’s fees.
(4) Except to the extent specified, this subsection may not be interpreted
to alter the [landlord’s] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER’S duties under subsections (e) and
(g) of this section.
(i) (1) Under this subsection, a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER:
(i) May not require the [tenant] RESIDENT to purchase a surety
bond; and
(ii) Is not required to consent to the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S purchase
of a surety bond.
(2) (i) Instead of paying all or part of a security deposit to a [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER under this section, a [tenant] RESIDENT may purchase a
surety bond to protect the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER against:
1. Nonpayment of rent;
2. Damage due to breach of lease; or
3. Damage caused by the [tenant] RESIDENT or the
[tenant’s] RESIDENT’S family, agents, employees, guests or invitees in excess of ordinary
wear and tear to the leased premises, common areas, major appliances, or furnishings
owned by the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER.
(ii) A surety shall refund to a [tenant] RESIDENT any premium or
other charge paid by the [tenant] RESIDENT in connection with a surety bond if, after the
[tenant] RESIDENT purchases a surety bond, the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER
refuses to accept the surety bond or the [tenant] RESIDENT does not enter into a lease with
the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER.
(3) (i) The amount of a surety bond purchased instead of a security

HOUSE BILL 1548
deposit may not exceed two months’ rent per dwelling unit.
(ii) If a [tenant] RESIDENT purchases a surety bond and provides a
security deposit in accordance with this section, the aggregate amount of both the surety
bond and security deposit may not exceed two months’ rent per dwelling unit.
(iii) 1. If a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER consents to a
surety bond but requires the surety bond to be in an amount in excess of two months’ rent,
the [tenant] RESIDENT may recover up to three times the extra amount charged for the
surety bond, plus reasonable attorney’s fees.
2. If a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER consents to
both a surety bond and a security deposit but requires the surety bond and the security
deposit to be in an aggregate amount in excess of two months’ rent, the [tenant] RESIDENT
may recover up to three times the extra amount charged for the surety bond, plus
reasonable attorney’s fees.
(4) Before a [tenant] RESIDENT purchases a surety bond instead of paying
all or part of a security deposit, a surety shall disclose in writing to the [tenant] RESIDENT
that:
(i) Payment for a surety bond is nonrefundable;
(ii) The surety bond is not insurance for the [tenant] RESIDENT;
(iii) The surety bond is being purchased to protect the [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER against loss due to nonpayment of rent, breach of lease, or
damages caused by the [tenant] RESIDENT;
(iv) The [tenant] RESIDENT may be required to reimburse the surety
for amounts the surety paid to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER;
(v) Even after a [tenant] RESIDENT purchases a surety bond, the
[tenant] RESIDENT is responsible for payment of:
1. All unpaid rent;
2. Damage due to breach of lease; and
3. Damage by the [tenant] RESIDENT or the [tenant’s]
RESIDENT’S family, agents, employees, guests, or invitees in excess of ordinary wear and
tear to the leased premises, common areas, major appliances, or furnishings owned by the
[landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER;
(vi) The [tenant] RESIDENT has the right to pay the damages

HOUSE BILL 1548 49
directly to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER or require the [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER to use the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S security deposit, if any, before the
[landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER makes a claim against the surety bond; and
(vii) If the surety fails to comply with the requirements of this
paragraph, the surety forfeits the right to make any claim against the [tenant] RESIDENT
under the surety bond.
(5) (i) A [tenant] RESIDENT who purchases a surety bond in
accordance with this subsection has the right to have the dwelling unit inspected by the
[landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER in the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S presence for the
purpose of making a written list of the damages that exist at the commencement of the
tenancy, if the [tenant] RESIDENT requests an inspection by certified mail within 15 days
of the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S occupancy.
(ii) A [tenant] RESIDENT who provides a surety bond under this
subsection shall have all the rights provided under subsection (f)(1)(ii) through (v) of this
section.
(iii) The surety or [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER shall
deliver to a [tenant] RESIDENT a copy of any agreements or documents signed by the
[tenant] RESIDENT at the time of the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S purchase of the surety bond.
(iv) A [tenant] RESIDENT shall be advised in writing of all of the
[tenant’s] RESIDENT’S rights under this subsection prior to the purchase of a surety bond.
(6) (i) A surety bond may be used to pay claims by a [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER for:
1. Unpaid rent;
2. Damage due to breach of lease;
3. Damage by the [tenant] RESIDENT or the [tenant’s]
RESIDENT’S family, agents, employees, guests, or invitees in excess of ordinary wear and
tear to the leased premises, common areas, major appliances, or furnishings owned by the
[landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER; or
4. The amount of a surcharge authorized under §
7–301(c)(5)(ii) of the Courts Article.
(ii) A surety bond does not represent liquidated damages and may
not be used as payment to a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER for breach of the rental
agreement, except in the amount that the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER is
actually damaged by the breach.

HOUSE BILL 1548
(iii) Except as provided in subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this
paragraph, a surety may not, directly or indirectly, make any other payment to a [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER.
(7) Subject to subsection (j) of this section, at least 10 days before a
[landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER makes a claim against a surety bond subject to
this subsection, the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER shall send to the [tenant]
RESIDENT by first–class mail directed to the last known address of the [tenant]
RESIDENT, a written list of the damages to be claimed and a statement of the costs actually
incurred by the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER.
(8) (i) A [tenant] RESIDENT shall have the right to pay any damages
directly to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER or require the [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER to use the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S security deposit, if any, before the
[landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER makes a claim against the surety bond.
(ii) If a [tenant] RESIDENT pays any damages directly to the
[landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER or requires the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER to use the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S security deposit under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph and the payment fully satisfies the claim, the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER shall forfeit the right to make a claim under the surety bond for any damages
covered by the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S payment or the amount deducted from the [tenant’s]
RESIDENT’S security deposit in accordance with subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(9) (i) The [tenant] RESIDENT may dispute the [landlord’s] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER’S claim to the surety by sending a written response by first–class mail
to the surety within 10 days after receiving the [landlord’s] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER’S
claim on the surety.
(ii) If the [tenant] RESIDENT disputes the claim, the surety may not
report the claim to a credit reporting agency prior to obtaining a judgment for the claim
against the [tenant] RESIDENT.
(10) In any proceeding brought by the surety against the [tenant]
RESIDENT on a surety bond under this subsection:
(i) The [tenant] RESIDENT shall retain all rights and defenses
otherwise available in a proceeding between a [tenant] RESIDENT and a [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER under this section; and
(ii) Damages may only be awarded to the surety to the extent that
the [tenant] RESIDENT would have been liable to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER under this section.

HOUSE BILL 1548 51
(11) (i) If a [landlord’s] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER’S interest in the
leased premises is sold or transferred, the new [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER
shall accept the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S surety bond and may not require:
1. During the current lease term, an additional security
deposit from the [tenant] RESIDENT; or
2. At any lease renewal, a surety bond or a security deposit
from the [tenant] RESIDENT that, in addition to any existing surety bond or security
deposit, is in an aggregate amount in excess of two months’ rent per dwelling unit.
(ii) If the aggregate amount described in subparagraph (i)2 of this
paragraph is in excess of two months’ rent, the [tenant] RESIDENT may recover up to three
times the extra amount charged, plus reasonable attorney’s fees.
(12) (i) If a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER fails to comply with
the requirements of this subsection, the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER forfeits
the right to make any claim against the surety bond.
(ii) If a surety fails to comply with the requirements of this
subsection, the surety forfeits the right to make any claim against a [tenant] RESIDENT
under the surety bond.
(13) If a surety, in an action against the [tenant] RESIDENT, asserts a claim
under the surety bond without having a reasonable basis to assert the claim, the court may
grant the [tenant] RESIDENT damages of up to three times the amount claimed plus
reasonable attorney’s fees.
(14) A surety bond issued under this subsection may only be issued by an
admitted carrier licensed by the Maryland Insurance Administration.
(j) (1) An itemized statement of costs provided under subsection (g)(1),
(h)(2)(iii), or (i)(7) of this section shall include supporting documentation that identifies the
materials or services provided.
(2) Subject to subsection (k) of this section, a [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER may satisfy the requirement under paragraph (1) of this subsection by
providing an estimate of the costs to be incurred by the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER.
(k) (1) This subsection applies only if a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER provides an estimate as documentation to support an itemized statement of costs
provided under subsection (g)(1), (h)(2)(iii), or (i)(7) of this section.

HOUSE BILL 1548
(2) (i) The [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER shall notify the
[tenant] RESIDENT in writing when the repairs have been completed.
(ii) The notice required under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph
shall include a copy of the final invoice for any repairs made by the [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER.
(3) If the actual costs incurred by the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER are less than the estimate provided to the [tenant] RESIDENT under subsection
(j)(2) of this section, the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER shall return to the
[tenant] RESIDENT within 30 days after completing the repairs the amount of the security
deposit withheld by the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER that is in excess of the
actual costs incurred by the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER.
(n) A [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER is entitled to rely on the list of yield
curve rates or the customized calculator maintained by the Department of Housing and
Community Development under subsection (k) of this section when calculating the interest
on a security deposit.
8–203.1.
(a) A receipt for a security deposit shall notify the [tenant] RESIDENT of the
following:
(1) The right to have the dwelling unit inspected by the [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER in the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S presence for the purpose of making a
written list of damages that exist at the commencement of the tenancy if the [tenant]
RESIDENT so requests by certified mail within 15 days of the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S
occupancy;
(2) The right to be present when the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER inspects the premises at the end of the tenancy in order to determine if any damage
was done to the premises if the [tenant] RESIDENT notifies the [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER by certified mail at least 15 days prior to the date of the [tenant’s]
RESIDENT’S intended move, of the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S intention to move, the date of
moving, and the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S new address;
(3) The [landlord’s] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER’S obligation to conduct
the inspection within 5 days before or after the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S stated date of
intended moving;
(4) The [landlord’s] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER’S obligation to notify the
[tenant] RESIDENT in writing of the date of the inspection;
(5) The [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S right to receive, by first–class mail,

HOUSE BILL 1548 53
delivered to the last known address of the [tenant] RESIDENT, a written list of the charges
against the security deposit claimed by the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER and
the actual costs, within 45 days after the termination of the tenancy;
(6) The obligation of the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER to return
any unused portion of the security deposit, by first–class mail, addressed to the [tenant’s]
RESIDENT’S last known address within 45 days after the termination of the tenancy; and
(7) A statement that failure of the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER
to comply with the security deposit law may result in the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER being liable to the [tenant] RESIDENT for a penalty of up to 3 times the security
deposit withheld, plus reasonable attorney’s fees.
(b) The [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER shall retain a copy of the receipt
for a period of 2 years after the termination of the tenancy, abandonment of the premises,
or eviction of the [tenant] RESIDENT, as the case may be.
(c) The [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER shall be liable to the [tenant]
RESIDENT in the sum of $25 if the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER fails to provide
a written receipt for the security deposit.
8–204.
(a) This section is applicable only to single or multi–family dwelling units.
(b) A [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER shall assure the [tenant]
RESIDENT that the [tenant] RESIDENT, peaceably and quietly, may enter on the leased
premises at the beginning of the term of any lease.
(c) If the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER fails to provide the [tenant]
RESIDENT with possession of the dwelling unit at the beginning of the term of any lease,
the rent payable under the lease shall abate until possession is delivered. The [tenant]
RESIDENT, on written notice to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER before
possession is delivered, may terminate, cancel, and rescind the lease.
(d) On termination of the lease under this section, the [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER is liable to the [tenant] RESIDENT for all money or property given as
prepaid rent, deposit, or security.
(e) If the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER fails to provide the [tenant]
RESIDENT with possession of the dwelling unit at the beginning of the term of any lease,
whether or not the lease is terminated under this section, the [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER is liable to the [tenant] RESIDENT for consequential damages actually
suffered by the [tenant] RESIDENT subsequent to the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S giving notice
to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER of the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S inability to

HOUSE BILL 1548
enter on the leased premises.
(f) The [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER may bring an action of eviction
and damages against any [tenant] RESIDENT holding over after the end of the [tenant’s]
RESIDENT’S term even though the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER has entered
into a lease with another [tenant] RESIDENT, and the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER may join the new [tenant] RESIDENT as a party to the action.
8–205.
(a) (1) In Anne Arundel County, unless the [tenant] RESIDENT makes
payment by check or rents the property for commercial or business purposes, if property is
leased for any definite term or at will, the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER shall
give the [tenant] RESIDENT a receipt showing payment and the time period which the
payment covers.
(2) On conviction of violating this section, any person or agent shall forfeit
the rent for the period in question.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (a) of this section, the [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER or [landlord’s] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER’S agent shall
give the [tenant] RESIDENT a receipt if the [tenant] RESIDENT:
(1) Makes payment in cash; or
(2) Requests a receipt.
(c) In addition to any other penalty, the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER
shall be liable to the [tenant] RESIDENT in the sum of $25 if the [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER fails to provide a written receipt as required by this section.
8–205.1.
(a) In this section, “utility service provider” means a public service company or a
unit of State or local government that provides water or sewer utility services.
(b) (1) This section applies only to a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER
of a building that contains one or two residential dwelling units.
(2) This section does not apply to:
(i) A [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER that requires a
[tenant] RESIDENT, under an oral or written lease, to pay water or sewer bills directly to
the utility service provider; or
(ii) A utility that is allocated using a ratio utility billing system, as

HOUSE BILL 1548 55
defined in § 8–212.4 of this subtitle.
(c) A [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER that requires a [tenant]
RESIDENT to make payments for water or sewer utility services to the [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER shall:
(1) Use a written lease that provides notice that the [tenant] RESIDENT is
responsible for making payments for water or sewer utility services to the [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER; and
(2) (i) Provide a copy of the water or sewer bill to the [tenant]
RESIDENT; or
(ii) Before the beginning of the initial lease and each term thereafter
for the duration of the tenancy, notify the [tenant] RESIDENT in writing of the total utility
costs billed to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER in the immediately preceding
year for water, sewer, gas, or electric utility services, disaggregated by utility type.
8–206.
(a) Evictions described in subsection (b) of this section are called “retaliatory
evictions”.
(b) No [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER may evict a [tenant] RESIDENT
of any residential property in Montgomery County because:
(1) The [tenant] RESIDENT has filed a complaint against the [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER with any public agency;
(2) The [tenant] RESIDENT has filed a lawsuit against the [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER; or
(3) The [tenant] RESIDENT is a member of any [tenants’] RESIDENTS’
organization.
(c) If the judgment is in favor of the [tenant] RESIDENT in any eviction
proceeding for any of the defenses in subsection (b) of this section, the court may enter
judgment for reasonable attorney fees and court costs against the [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER.
(d) Nothing in this section restricts the authority of Montgomery County to
legislate in the area of [landlord–tenant] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER–RESIDENT affairs.
(e) In addition to any other remedies provided under this title, Montgomery
County may, by local law, establish authorization for a local agency to invoke enforcement

HOUSE BILL 1548
procedures upon an administrative determination that a proposed eviction is retaliatory as
prohibited by State or local law. These enforcement procedures may include injunctive or
other equitable relief.
8–207.
(a) The aggrieved party in a breach of a lease has a duty to mitigate damages if
the damages result from the [landlord’s] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER’S or [tenant’s]
RESIDENT’S:
(1) Failure to supply possession of the dwelling unit;
(2) Failure or refusal to take possession at the beginning of the term; or
(3) Termination of occupancy before the end of the term.
(b) The provisions of subsection (a) of this section do not impose an obligation to
show or lease the vacated dwelling unit in preference to other available units.
(c) (1) If a [tenant] RESIDENT wrongly fails or refuses to take possession of or
vacates the dwelling unit before the end of the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S term, the [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER may sublet the dwelling unit without prior notice to the
[tenant] RESIDENT in default.
(2) [The tenant] A RESIDENT in default is secondarily liable for rent for
the term of the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S original agreement in addition to the [tenant’s]
RESIDENT’S liability for consequential damages resulting from the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S
breach, if the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER gives the [tenant] RESIDENT
prompt notice of any default by the sublessee.
(d) No provision in this section may be waived in any lease.
8–208.
(a) (1) On or after October 1, 1999, any [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER who offers 5 or more dwelling units for rent in the State may not rent a residential
dwelling unit without using a written lease.
(2) If a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER fails to comply with
paragraph (1) of this subsection, the term of the tenancy is presumed to be 1 year from the
date of the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S first occupancy unless the [tenant] RESIDENT elects to
end the tenancy at an earlier date by giving 1 month’s written notice.
(b) A [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER who rents using a written lease
shall provide, upon written request from any prospective applicant for a lease, a copy of the
proposed form of lease in writing, complete in every material detail, except for the date, the

HOUSE BILL 1548 57
name and address of the [tenant] RESIDENT, the designation of the premises, and the
rental rate without requiring execution of the lease or any prior deposit.
(c) A lease shall include:
(1) A statement that the premises will be made available in a condition
permitting habitation, with reasonable safety, if that is the agreement, or if that is not the
agreement, a statement of the agreement concerning the condition of the premises;
(2) The [landlord’s] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER’S and the [tenant’s]
RESIDENT’S specific obligations as to heat, gas, electricity, water, and repair of the
premises;
(3) A receipt for the security deposit as specified in § 8–203.1 of this
subtitle; and
(4) A copy of the most current version of the Maryland [Tenants’]
RESIDENTS’ Bill of Rights published by the Office of [Tenant] RESIDENT and [Landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER Affairs in the Department of Housing and Community
Development.
(d) A [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER may not use a lease or form of lease
containing any provision that:
(1) Has the [tenant] RESIDENT authorize any person to confess judgment
on a claim arising out of the lease;
(2) Has the [tenant] RESIDENT agree to waive or to forego any right or
remedy provided by applicable law;
(3) (i) Provides for a penalty for the late payment of rent in excess of
5% of the amount of rent due for the rental period for which the payment was delinquent;
or
(ii) In the case of leases under which the rent is paid in weekly rental
installments, provides for a late penalty of more than $3 per week or a total of no more than
$12 per month;
(4) Has the [tenant] RESIDENT waive the right to a jury trial;
(5) Has the [tenant] RESIDENT agree to a period required for [landlord’s]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER’S notice to quit which is less than that provided by applicable
law; provided, however, that neither party is prohibited from agreeing to a longer notice
period than that required by applicable law;
(6) Authorizes the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER to take

HOUSE BILL 1548
possession of the leased premises, or the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S personal property unless
the lease has been terminated by action of the parties or by operation of law, and the
personal property has been abandoned by the [tenant] RESIDENT without the benefit of
formal legal process;
(7) Is against public policy and void pursuant to § 8–105 of this title;
(8) Permits a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER to commence an
eviction proceeding or issue a notice to quit solely as retaliation against any [tenant]
RESIDENT for planning, organizing, or joining a [tenant] RESIDENT organization with the
purpose of negotiating collectively with the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER;
(9) Requires the [tenant] RESIDENT to accept notice of rent increases
under § 8–209 of this subtitle or § 8–401 of this title by electronic delivery;
(10) (i) Limits the ability of a [tenant] RESIDENT to summon the
assistance of law enforcement or emergency services or penalizes a [tenant] RESIDENT
solely for summoning the assistance of law enforcement or emergency services; or
(ii) Penalizes a [tenant] RESIDENT for the actions of another
individual solely because the individual summoned the assistance of law enforcement or
emergency services;
(11) Requires a [tenant] RESIDENT to pay more than the sum of the
security deposit under § 8–203(b) of this subtitle and the first month’s rent in order to
commence the lease and occupy the premises;
(12) Waives or places conditions on a [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S right of first
refusal under § 8–119 of this title; or
(13) Except as authorized under § 7–301(c)(5)(ii) of the Courts Article,
provides that a [tenant] RESIDENT is responsible for, or requires a [tenant] RESIDENT to
agree to be responsible for, payment of a filing surcharge assessed against the [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER by the District Court under § 7–301(c)(2)(i)1 of the Courts
Article.
(e) (1) Except for a lease containing an automatic renewal period of 1 month
or less, a lease that contains a provision calling for an automatic renewal of the lease term
unless prior notice is given by the party or parties seeking to terminate the lease, shall
have the provision distinctly set apart from any other provision of the lease and provide a
space for the written acknowledgment of the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S agreement to the
automatic renewal provision.
(2) An automatic renewal provision that is not specifically accompanied by
either the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S initials, signature, or witnessed mark is unenforceable

HOUSE BILL 1548 59
by the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER.
(f) No provision of this section shall be deemed to be a bar to the applicability of
supplementary rights afforded by any public local law enacted by the General Assembly or
any ordinance or local law enacted by any municipality or political subdivision of this State;
provided, however, that no such law can diminish or limit any right or remedy granted
under the provisions of this section.
(g) (1) Any lease provision which is prohibited by terms of this section shall be
unenforceable by the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER.
(2) If the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER includes in any lease a
provision prohibited by this section or made unenforceable by § 8–105 of this title or §
8–203 of this subtitle, at any time subsequent to July 1, 1975, and tenders a lease
containing such a provision or attempts to enforce or makes known to the [tenant]
RESIDENT an intent to enforce any such provision, the [tenant] RESIDENT may recover
any actual damages incurred as a reason thereof, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
(h) If any word, phrase, clause, sentence, or any part or parts of this section shall
be held unconstitutional by any court of competent jurisdiction such unconstitutionality
shall not affect the validity of the remaining parts of this section.
8–208.1.
(a) (1) For any reason listed in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER of any residential property may not:
(i) Bring or threaten to bring an action for possession against a
[tenant] RESIDENT;
(ii) Arbitrarily increase the rent or decrease the services to which a
[tenant] RESIDENT has been entitled; or
(iii) Terminate a periodic tenancy.
(2) A [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER may not take an action that
is listed under paragraph (1) of this subsection for any of the following reasons:
(i) Because the [tenant] RESIDENT or the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S
agent has provided written or actual notice of a good faith complaint about an alleged
violation of the lease, violation of law, or condition on the leased premises that is a
substantial threat to the health or safety of occupants to:
1. The [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER; or
2. Any public agency against the [landlord] RENTAL

HOUSE BILL 1548
PROPERTY OWNER;
(ii) Because the [tenant] RESIDENT or the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S
agent has:
1. Filed a lawsuit against the [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER; or
2. Testified or participated in a lawsuit involving the
[landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER; or
(iii) Because the [tenant] RESIDENT has participated in any
[tenants’] RESIDENTS’ organization or
(iv) Solely because the [tenant] RESIDENT or another individual,
including another resident, summoned the assistance of law enforcement or emergency
services to the property.
(b) (1) A [landlord’s] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER’S violation of subsection (a)
of this section is a “retaliatory action”.
(2) A [tenant] RESIDENT may raise a retaliatory action of a [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER:
(i) In defense to an action for possession; or
(ii) As an affirmative claim for damages resulting from a retaliatory
action of a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER occurring during a tenancy.
(c) (1) If in any proceeding the court finds in favor of the [tenant] RESIDENT
because the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER engaged in a retaliatory action, the
court may enter judgment against the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER for damages
not to exceed the equivalent of 3 months’ rent, reasonable attorney fees, and court costs.
(2) If in any proceeding the court finds that a [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S
assertion of a retaliatory action was in bad faith or without substantial justification, the
court may enter judgment against the [tenant] RESIDENT for damages not to exceed the
equivalent of 3 months’ rent, reasonable attorney fees, and court costs.
(d) The relief provided under this section is conditioned on the [tenant]
RESIDENT being current on the rent due and owing to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER at the time of the alleged retaliatory action, unless the [tenant] RESIDENT
withholds rent in accordance with the lease, § 8–211 of this subtitle, or a comparable local
ordinance.

HOUSE BILL 1548 61
(e) An action by a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER’S may not be deemed
to be retaliatory for purposes of this section if the alleged retaliatory action occurs more
than 6 months after a [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S action that is protected under subsection
(a)(2) of this section.
(f) As long as a [landlord’s] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER’S termination of a
tenancy is not the result of a retaliatory action, nothing in this section may be interpreted
to alter the [landlord’s] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER’S or the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S
rights to terminate or not renew a tenancy.
(g) If any county has enacted or enacts an ordinance comparable in subject matter
to this section, this section shall supersede the provisions of the ordinance to the extent
that the ordinance provides less protection to a [tenant] RESIDENT.
8–208.2.
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of § 8–208.1 of this subtitle, a [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER of real property subject to the provisions of Title 6, Subtitle
8 of the Environment Article may not evict or take any other retaliatory action against a
[tenant] RESIDENT primarily as a result of the [tenant] RESIDENT providing information
to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER under Title 6, Subtitle 8 of the Environment
Article.
(b) For purposes of this section, a retaliatory action includes:
(1) An arbitrary refusal to renew a lease;
(2) Termination of a tenancy;
(3) An arbitrary rent increase or decrease in services to which the [tenant]
RESIDENT is entitled; or
(4) Any form of constructive eviction.
(c) A [tenant] RESIDENT subject to an eviction or retaliatory action under this
section is entitled to the relief, and is eligible for reasonable attorney’s fees and costs,
authorized under § 8–208.1 of this subtitle.
(d) Nothing in this section may be interpreted to alter the [landlord’s] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER’S or the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S rights arising from a breach of any
provision of a lease.
8–208.3.
Every [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER shall maintain a records system
showing the dates and amounts of rent paid to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER

HOUSE BILL 1548
by the [tenant] RESIDENT or [tenants] RESIDENTS and showing also the fact that a
receipt of some form was given to each [tenant] RESIDENT for each cash payment of rent.
8–210.
(a) (1) The [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER of any residential rental
property shall include in a written lease or post a sign in a conspicuous place on that
property listing the name, address, and telephone number of:
(i) The [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER; or
(ii) The person, if any, authorized to accept notice or service of
process on behalf of the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER.
(2) If a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER fails to comply with
paragraph (1) of this subsection, notice or service of process shall be deemed to be proper if
the [tenant] RESIDENT sends notice or service of process by any of the following means:
(i) To the person to whom the rent is paid;
(ii) To the address where the rent is paid; or
(iii) To the address where the tax bill is sent.
(b) (1) This subsection applies only in Montgomery County.
(2) In this subsection, “development” has the meaning provided in §
11B–101 of this article.
(3) (i) Before execution by a [tenant] RESIDENT of a lease for an initial
term of 125 days or more, the owner of any residential rental property within any
condominium or development shall provide to the prospective [tenant] RESIDENT, to the
extent applicable, a copy of the rules, declaration, and recorded covenants and restrictions
that limit or affect the use and occupancy of the property or common areas and to which
the owner is obligated.
(ii) The written lease shall include a statement, if applicable, that
the obligations of the owner that limit or affect the use and occupancy of the property are
enforceable against the owner’s [tenant] RESIDENT.
(c) (1) The [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER of any residential rental
property shall:
(i) Provide a link to the property’s pet policy on the property’s
website, if applicable; and

HOUSE BILL 1548 63
(ii) Provide a written copy or summary of the property’s pet policy in
any rental application form for a unit in the property.
(2) A pet policy provided in accordance with this section shall state:
(i) Any breed and weight restrictions;
(ii) Any required fees, including:
1. Up–front, nonrefundable pet fees;
2. Refundable pet deposits; and
3. Monthly pet fees;
(iii) Any limit on the number of pets allowed in a unit;
(iv) Any vaccination requirements;
(v) Any liability insurance requirements; and
(vi) Any additional requirements for pet owners imposed by the
[landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER.
8–211.
(a) (1) The purpose of this section is to provide [tenants] RESIDENTS with a
mechanism for encouraging the repair of serious and dangerous defects which exist within
or as part of any residential dwelling unit, or upon the property used in common of which
the dwelling unit forms a part.
(2) The defects sought to be reached by this section are those [which] THAT
present a substantial and serious threat of danger to the life, health and safety of the
occupants of the dwelling unit, and not those which merely impair the aesthetic value of
the premises, or which are, in those locations governed by such codes, housing code
violations of a nondangerous nature.
(3) The intent of this section is not to provide a remedy for dangerous
conditions in the community at large which exists apart from the leased premises or the
property in common of which the leased premises forms a part.
(b) It is the public policy of Maryland that meaningful sanctions be imposed upon
those who allow dangerous conditions and defects to exist in leased premises, and that an
effective mechanism be established for repairing these conditions and halting their
creation.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, this section

HOUSE BILL 1548
applies to all residential dwelling units leased for the purpose of human habitation within
the State whether they are:
(i) Publicly or privately owned; or
(ii) Single or multiple units.
(2) This section does not apply to farm tenancies.
(d) This section provides a remedy and imposes an obligation on [landlords]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNERS. to repair and eliminate conditions and defects which
constitute, or if not promptly corrected will constitute, a fire hazard or a serious and
substantial threat to the life, health, or safety of occupants, including:
(1) Lack of heat, light, electricity, or hot or cold running water, except
where the [tenant] RESIDENT is responsible for the payment of the utilities and the lack
thereof is the direct result of the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S failure to pay the charges;
(2) Lack of adequate sewage disposal facilities;
(3) Infestation of rodents in two or more dwelling units;
(4) The existence of any structural defect which presents a serious and
substantial threat to the physical safety of the occupants; or
(5) The existence of any condition which presents a health or fire hazard to
the dwelling unit.
(e) (1) This section does not apply to a [landlord’s] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER’S failure to repair and eliminate minor defects or, in those locations governed by
such codes, housing code violations of a nondangerous nature.
(2) There is a rebuttable presumption that the following conditions, when
they do not present a serious and substantial threat to the life, health, and safety of the
occupants, are not covered by this section:
(i) Any defect which merely reduces the aesthetic value of the leased
premises, such as the lack of fresh paint, rugs, carpets, paneling, or other decorative
amenities;
(ii) Small cracks in the walls, floors, or ceilings;
(iii) The absence of linoleum or tile on the floors, provided that they
are otherwise safe and structurally sound; or
(iv) The absence of air conditioning.

HOUSE BILL 1548 65
(f) (1) In order to employ the remedies provided by this section, the [tenant]
RESIDENT shall notify the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER of the existence of the
defects or conditions.
(2) Notice shall be given by:
(i) A written communication sent by certified mail listing the
asserted conditions or defects;
(ii) Actual notice of the defects or conditions; or
(iii) A written violation, condemnation or other notice from an
appropriate State, county, municipal, or local government agency stating the asserted
conditions or defects.
(g) (1) The [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER has a reasonable time
after receipt of notice in which to make the repairs or correct the conditions.
(2) The length of time deemed to be reasonable is a question of fact for the
court, taking into account the severity of the defects or conditions and the danger which
they present to the occupants.
(3) There is a rebuttable presumption that a period in excess of 30 days
from receipt of notice is unreasonable.
(h) (1) If the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER refuses to make the
repairs or correct the conditions, or if after a reasonable time the [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER has failed to do so, the [tenant] RESIDENT may take one or both of
the following actions:
(i) Bring an action of rent escrow to pay rent into court because of
the asserted defects or conditions; and
(ii) Refuse to pay rent and raise the existence of the asserted defects
or conditions as an affirmative defense to an action for distress for rent or to any complaint
proceeding brought by the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER to recover rent or the
possession of the leased premises.
(2) (i) Multiple [tenants] RESIDENTS may join as plaintiffs in an
action under this section in accordance with the Maryland Rules on joinder.
(ii) The court may order separate trials or issue any other order
necessary to prevent delay or avoid prejudice.
(i) (1) There is a rebuttable presumption that a [tenant] RESIDENT is entitled

HOUSE BILL 1548
to the adjudication of a request for rent abatement.
(2) (i) Subject to subsection (m) of this section, there is a rebuttable
presumption that a [tenant] RESIDENT is entitled to an abatement of prospective rent in
an amount to be determined by the court.
(ii) A determination under this paragraph is without prejudice to a
final disposition of rent that is due and unpaid to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER.
(3) There is a rebuttable presumption that a court order requiring rent
escrow is limited to the payment of rent that is due and unpaid subsequent to the court
order.
(4) A party may request that the court adjust the amount of rent that a
[tenant] RESIDENT pays into court at any time.
(5) If a [tenant] RESIDENT alleges that a defect or condition exists at the
leased premises at a trial for failure to pay rent, the court may grant a postponement on
request of either party in order for the parties to provide evidence and additional
information regarding the alleged defect or condition.
(j) (1) Whether the issue of rent escrow is raised affirmatively or defensively,
the [tenant] RESIDENT may request one or more of the forms of relief set forth in this
section.
(2) In addition to any other relief sought, if within 90 days after the court
finds that the conditions complained of by the [tenant] RESIDENT exist and the [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER has not made the repairs or corrected the conditions
complained of, the [tenant] RESIDENT may file a petition of injunction in the District Court
requesting the court to order the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER to make the
repairs or correct the conditions.
(k) Relief under this section is conditioned on:
(1) Giving proper notice, and where appropriate, the opportunity to correct,
as described in subsection (g) of this section;
(2) Payment by the [tenant] RESIDENT of the amount of rent required by
the lease into the court, unless this amount is modified by the court as provided in
subsection (i) or (m) of this section;
(3) In the case of tenancies measured by a period of 1 month or more, the
court having not entered against the [tenant] RESIDENT three prior judgments of
possession for rent due and unpaid in the 12–month period immediately prior to the
initiation of the action by the [tenant] RESIDENT or by the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY

HOUSE BILL 1548 67
OWNER; and
(4) In the case of periodic tenancies measured by the weekly payment of
rent, the court having not entered against the [tenant] RESIDENT more than five
judgments of possession for rent due and unpaid in the 12–month period immediately prior
to the initiation of the action by the [tenant] RESIDENT or by the [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER, or, if the [tenant] RESIDENT has lived on the premises 6 months or
less, the court having not entered against the [tenant] RESIDENT three judgments of
possession for rent due and unpaid.
(l) It is a sufficient defense to the allegations of the [tenant] RESIDENT that the
[tenant] RESIDENT, the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S family, agent, employees, or assignees or
social guests have caused the asserted defects or conditions, or that the [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER or the [landlord’s] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER’S agents were denied
reasonable and appropriate entry for the purpose of correcting or repairing the asserted
conditions or defects.
(m) The court shall make appropriate findings of fact and make any order that the
justice of the case may require, including any one or a combination of the following:
(1) Order the termination of the lease and return of the leased premises to
the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER, subject to the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’s right of
redemption;
(2) Order that the action for rent escrow be dismissed;
(3) Order that the amount of rent required by the lease, whether paid into
court or to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER, be abated and reduced in an
amount determined by the court to be fair and equitable to represent the existence of the
conditions or defects found by the court to exist; or
(4) Order the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER to make the repairs
or correct the conditions complained of by the [tenant] RESIDENT and found by the court
to exist.
(n) (1) After rent escrow has been established, the court:
(i) Shall, after a hearing, if so ordered by the court or one is
requested by the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER, order that the money in the
escrow account be disbursed to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER after the
necessary repairs have been made;
(ii) May, after an appropriate hearing, order that some or all money
in the escrow account be paid to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER or the
[landlord’s] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER’S agent, the [tenant] RESIDENT or the

HOUSE BILL 1548
[tenant’s] RESIDENT’S agent, or any other appropriate person or agency for the purpose of
making the necessary repairs of the dangerous conditions or defects;
(iii) May, after a hearing if one is requested by the [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER, appoint a special administrator who shall cause the repairs
to be made, and who shall apply to the court to pay for them out of the money in the escrow
account;
(iv) May, after an appropriate hearing, order that some or all money
in the escrow account be disbursed to pay any mortgage or deed of trust on the property in
order to stay a foreclosure;
(v) May, after a hearing, if one is requested by the [tenant]
RESIDENT, order, if no repairs are made or if no good faith effort to repair is made within
6 months of the initial decision to place money in the escrow account, that the money in the
escrow account be disbursed to the [tenant] RESIDENT that has paid into escrow; or
(vi) May, after an appropriate hearing, order that the money in the
escrow account be disbursed to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER if the [tenant]
RESIDENT does not regularly pay, into that account, the rent owed.
(2) An order issued under paragraph (1)(v) of this subsection:
(i) Does not affect the right of a [tenant] RESIDENT to pay rent into
court; and
(ii) May be stayed on appeal by the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER.
(o) If a court orders any relief to a [tenant] RESIDENT who brings an action under
this section, the [tenant] RESIDENT may recover:
(1) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs; and
(2) Reasonable expenses related to litigation.
(p) If a court finds that a complaint filed by a [tenant] RESIDENT under this
section is in bad faith or without substantial justification, the court may enter a judgment
in favor of the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER for:
(1) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs; and
(2) Expenses related to litigation.
(q) Except as provided in § 8–211.1(e) of this subtitle, this section shall supersede
any local law or ordinance comparable in subject matter to this section except to the extent

HOUSE BILL 1548 69
that the local law or ordinance provides broader applicability or more protections for
[tenants] RESIDENTS than this section.
8–211.1.
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law or any agreement, whether written or
oral, if a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER fails to comply with the applicable risk
reduction standard under § 6–815 or § 6–819 of the Environment Article, the [tenant]
RESIDENT may deposit the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S rent in an escrow account with the
clerk of the District Court for the district in which the premises are located.
(b) The right of a [tenant] RESIDENT to deposit rent in an escrow account does
not preclude the [tenant] RESIDENT from pursuing any other right or remedy available to
the [tenant] RESIDENT at law or equity and is in addition to them.
(c) Money deposited in an escrow account shall be released under the following
terms and conditions:
(1) To the lessor upon compliance by the lessor with the applicable risk
reduction standard; or
(2) To the lessee or any other person who has complied with the applicable
risk reduction standard on presentation of a bill for the reasonable costs of complying with
the applicable risk reduction standard.
(d) (1) A lessee may not be evicted, the tenancy may not be terminated, and
the rent may not be raised for a lessee who elects to seek the remedies under this section.
(2) It shall be presumed that any attempt to evict the lessee, to terminate
the tenancy, or to raise the rent, except for nonpayment of rent, within two months after
compliance with the applicable risk reduction standard is in retaliation for the lessee’s
proceeding under this section and shall be void.
(e) This section shall preempt any public local law or ordinance concerning the
deposit of rent into an escrow account based upon the existence of paint containing lead
pigment on surfaces in or on a rental dwelling unit in the State and disposition of that rent.
8–212.1.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, if a person who is on active
duty with the United States military, or the person’s spouse, enters into a residential lease
of property and the person subsequently receives a change of assignment, before or after
occupying the property, any liability of the person, or the person’s spouse, for rent under
the lease may not exceed:
(1) Any rent or lawful charges then due and payable plus 30 days’ rent after

HOUSE BILL 1548
written notice and proof of the change of assignment is given to the [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER; and
(2) The cost of repairing damage to the premises caused by an act or
omission of the [tenant] RESIDENT.
8–212.2.
(a) In this section, “mental disorder” has the meaning stated in § 10–101 of the
Health – General Article.
(b) This section does not apply to a [tenant] RESIDENT under a residential lease
that contains a liquidated damages clause or early termination clause that:
(1) Requires written notice to vacate of 1 month or less; and
(2) Imposes liability for rent less than or equal to 2 months’ rent after the
date on which the [tenant] RESIDENT vacates the leased premises.
(c) Subject to subsection (b) of this section and notwithstanding any other
provision of this title, if a [tenant] RESIDENT under a residential lease meets the
conditions set forth in subsection (d) of this section, the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S liability for
rent under the lease may not exceed 2 months’ rent after the date on which the [tenant]
RESIDENT vacates the leased premises.
(d) To qualify for the limitation of liability under subsection (c) of this section, the
[tenant] RESIDENT shall provide to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER before the
[tenant] RESIDENT vacates the leased premises:
(1) Subject to the provisions of subsection (e) of this section, a written
certification from a physician or psychologist regarding an individual who is a named party
in, or an authorized occupant under the terms of, the lease that states in substantially the
following form:
“I, (name of physician or psychologist), hereby certify that my patient, (name of
patient), is no longer able to live at his or her leased premises, (address of leased premises),
because the patient has a medical condition that:
(1) Substantially restricts the physical mobility of the patient within, or
from entering and exiting, the leased premises;
(2) Requires the patient to move to a home, facility, or institution to obtain
a higher level of care than can be provided at the leased premises; or
(3) Is a mental disorder that:

HOUSE BILL 1548 71
(i) Causes the continued habitation of the leased premises to be
unfeasible or unsustainable for the patient; or
(ii) Requires the patient to move to a home, facility, or institution to
obtain a higher level of care than can be provided at the leased premises.
I certify further that the expected duration of the patient’s medical condition will
continue beyond the termination date of the patient’s lease, which the patient states is
(termination date of lease).”; and
(2) A written notice of the termination of the lease stating the date by when
the [tenant] RESIDENT will vacate the leased premises.
(e) A certification that is provided to a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER
under subsection (d)(1) of this section shall be:
(1) Written by:
(i) A physician who is licensed by the State Board of Physicians to
practice medicine in the State under Title 14 of the Health Occupations Article; or
(ii) A psychologist who is licensed by the State Board of Examiners
of Psychologists to practice psychology in the State under Title 18 of the Health Occupations
Article;
(2) Prepared on the letterhead or printed prescription form of the physician
or psychologist; and
(3) Signed by the physician or psychologist.
8–212.3.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Affected dwelling unit” has the meaning stated in § 7–309 of the Public
Utilities Article.
(3) [“Landlord”] “RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER” has the meaning stated
in § 7–309 of the Public Utilities Article.
(4) [“Tenant”] “RESIDENT” has the meaning stated in § 7–309 of the
Public Utilities Article.
(5) “Utility service” has the meaning stated in § 7–309 of the Public
Utilities Article.
(6) “Utility service provider” has the meaning stated in § 7–309 of the

HOUSE BILL 1548
Public Utilities Article.
(b) A [tenant] RESIDENT may deduct from rent due to a [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER the amount of payments made to a utility service provider for utility
service if:
(1) An oral or written lease for an affected dwelling unit requires the
[landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER to pay the utility bill; and
(2) (i) The [tenant] RESIDENT pays all or part of the utility bill,
including payments made on a new utility service account; or
(ii) The [tenant] RESIDENT pays any security deposit required to
obtain a new utility service account.
(c) A [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S rights under this section may not be waived in any
lease.
8–213.
(a) An application for a lease shall contain a statement which explains:
(1) The liabilities which the [tenant] RESIDENT incurs upon signing the
application; and
(2) The provisions of subsections (b) and (c) of this section.
(b) (1) (i) If a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER requires from a
prospective [tenant] RESIDENT any fees other than a security deposit as defined by §
8–203(a) of this subtitle, and these fees exceed $25, then the [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER shall return the fees, subject to the exceptions below, or be liable for
twice the amount of the fees in damages.
(ii) The return shall be made not later than 15 days following the
date of occupancy or the written communication, by either party to the other, of a decision
that no tenancy shall occur.
(2) The [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER may retain only that
portion of the fees actually expended for a credit check or other expenses arising out of the
application, and shall return that portion of the fees not actually expended on behalf of the
[tenant] RESIDENT making application.
(c) This section does not apply to any [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER
who offers four or less dwelling units for rent on one parcel of property or at one location,
or to seasonal or condominium rentals.

HOUSE BILL 1548 73
8–214.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Elderly person” means an individual who is 60 years old or older.
(3) [“Landlord”] “RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER” means an owner of
residential rental property who offers more than 3 dwelling units for rent on 1 parcel of
property or at 1 location.
(b) This section applies only to Montgomery County.
(c) If a [tenant] RESIDENT is an elderly person, a [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER may not prohibit the [tenant] RESIDENT from keeping a household
pet, unless specifically prohibited in writing at the time occupancy took place.
(d) A [tenant] RESIDENT is liable for any damage done to the premises by the
[tenant’s] RESIDENT’S pet.
(e) A [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER may establish reasonable rules
governing the type, size, and number of pets allowed, disposal of pet waste, and aspects of
pet conduct and pet control related to protection of the health and safety of other [tenants]
RESIDENTS and the property of the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER.
8–215.
(a) In this section, “affected property” and “owner” have the meanings stated in §
6–801 of the Environment Article.
(b) (1) If an owner of an affected property fails to comply with the applicable
risk reduction standard under § 6–815 or § 6–819 of the Environment Article, the owner,
on the written request of the [tenant] RESIDENT, shall:
(i) Immediately release the [tenant] RESIDENT from the terms of
the lease or rental agreement for that property; and
(ii) Pay to the [tenant] RESIDENT all reasonable relocation
expenses, not to exceed $2,500, directly related to the permanent relocation of the [tenant]
RESIDENT to a lead–free dwelling unit or another dwelling unit that has satisfied the risk
reduction standard in accordance with § 6–815 of the Environment Article.
(2) A [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S written request to the [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall include any risk reduction
certification information provided by the Department of the Environment.
(3) Within 3 business days of receipt of a [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S written

HOUSE BILL 1548
request under paragraph (1) of this subsection, an owner may provide to the [tenant]
RESIDENT:
(i) A current and valid risk reduction certificate;
(ii) A lead–free certificate;
(iii) A statement of verification by the owner and [tenant] RESIDENT
of work performed in accordance with § 6–819(g) of the Environment Article for the affected
property; or
(iv) The final report of an inspector verifying that work was
performed on the affected property in accordance with § 6–819(g) of the Environment
Article.
(c) (1) If an owner fails to provide information in accordance with subsection
(b)(3) of this section or to comply with the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S written request under
subsection (b)(1) of this section within 3 business days of receipt of the request, the [tenant]
RESIDENT may bring an action in District Court for the:
(i) Lease termination;
(ii) Reimbursement of reasonable relocation expenses; and
(iii) Reasonable attorney’s fees.
(2) A [tenant] RESIDENT does not have a cause of action under this
subsection if the owner of an affected property provides information in accordance with
subsection (b)(3) of this section.
(d) The right of a [tenant] RESIDENT to request release in accordance with
subsection (b) of this section does not preclude the [tenant] RESIDENT from pursuing any
other right or remedy available to the [tenant] RESIDENT at law or equity and is in
addition to them.
(e) Any action or inaction of the owner of an affected property or [tenant]
RESIDENT under this section or any finding in a proceeding under this section may not be
construed to have any effect on:
(1) Any civil action; or
(2) Any administrative proceeding brought under this title or Title 6 of the
Environment Article.
8–216.

HOUSE BILL 1548 75
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Threaten to take possession” means using words or actions intended to
convince a reasonable person that the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER intends to
take imminent possession of the property in violation of this section.
(3) (i) “Willful diminution of services” means intentionally interrupting
or causing the interruption of heat, running water, hot water, electricity, or gas by the
[landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER for the purpose of forcing a [tenant] RESIDENT to
abandon the property.
(ii) “Willful diminution of services” does not include a [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER choosing not to continue to pay for utility service for
residential property after a final court order awarding possession of the residential
property, if the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER has provided the [tenant]
RESIDENT reasonable notice of the [landlord’s] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER’S intention
and the opportunity for the [tenant] RESIDENT to open an account in the [tenant’s]
RESIDENT’S name for that service.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER may not take possession or threaten to take possession of a
dwelling unit from a [tenant] RESIDENT or [tenant] RESIDENT holding over by locking
the [tenant] RESIDENT out or any other action, including willful diminution of services to
the [tenant] RESIDENT.
(2) A [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER may take possession of a
dwelling unit from a [tenant] RESIDENT or [tenant] RESIDENT holding over only:
(i) In accordance with a warrant of restitution issued by a court and
executed by a sheriff or constable; or
(ii) If the [tenant] RESIDENT has abandoned or surrendered
possession of the dwelling unit.
(c) (1) If in any proceeding the court finds in favor of the [tenant] RESIDENT
because the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER violated subsection (b) of this section,
the [tenant] RESIDENT may recover:
(i) Actual damages; and
(ii) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.
(2) The remedies set forth in this subsection are not exclusive.
(d) This section may not be construed to prevent a [landlord] RENTAL

HOUSE BILL 1548
PROPERTY OWNER from taking temporary measures, including changing the locks, to
secure an unsecured residential property, if the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER
makes good faith attempts to provide reasonable notice to the [tenant] RESIDENT that the
[tenant] RESIDENT may promptly be restored to possession of the property.
8–217.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) [“Landlord”] “RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER” means the owner of a
senior apartment facility.
(3) (i) “Senior apartment facility” means an apartment building or
complex that:
1. Contains four or more individual dwelling units; and
2. Is housing for older persons as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 3607.
(ii) “Senior apartment facility” does not include a nursing home or
an assisted living facility.
(b) (1) At least 180 days before converting a senior apartment facility into an
apartment facility for the general population, the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER
shall provide each [tenant] RESIDENT of the senior apartment facility with written notice
of the conversion.
(2) The notice shall include:
(i) A statement that the senior apartment facility will be converted
into an apartment facility for the general population;
(ii) The date on which the conversion will take place; and
(iii) A statement that the [tenant] RESIDENT has the right to
terminate the lease at any time before the conversion date, provided that the [tenant]
RESIDENT gives the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER at least 1 month’s written
notice.
(c) Notwithstanding the terms of the lease, the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER:
(1) Shall allow any [tenant] RESIDENT who requests to move before the
conversion date to terminate the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S lease after giving at least 1
month’s written notice to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER; and

HOUSE BILL 1548 77
(2) May not withhold any portion of a [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S security
deposit for rent that would have become due under any remaining term of the lease after
termination under this section.
(d) To the extent that a violation of any provision of this section affects a [tenant]
RESIDENT of a senior apartment facility, that violation shall be within the scope of the
enforcement duties and powers of the Division of Consumer Protection of the Office of the
Attorney General, as described in Title 13 of the Commercial Law Article.
8–5A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Legal occupant” means an occupant who resides on the premises with the
actual knowledge and permission of the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER.
(h) “Report by a qualified third party” means a report based on information
received by a qualified third party while acting in a professional capacity that:
(1) Indicates that the [tenant] RESIDENT or a legal occupant is seeking
assistance as a result of an act of abuse;
(2) Includes the following elements:
(i) The name of the [tenant] RESIDENT or legal occupant;
(ii) A statement that the [tenant] RESIDENT or legal occupant is a
victim of abuse;
(iii) The date, time, location, and a brief description of the incident;
(iv) The name and physical description of the alleged offender, if
known;
(v) The name and address of the employer of the qualified third
party;
(vi) The licensing entity and license number of the qualified third
party, if the qualified third party is required to be licensed; and
(vii) The signature of the qualified third party, under seal of a notary
public; and
(3) Is signed and acknowledged by the [tenant] RESIDENT or legal
occupant under penalty of perjury.

HOUSE BILL 1548
8–5A–02.
(a) Subject to the requirements of subsections (b) and (c) of this section, a [tenant]
RESIDENT may terminate the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S future liability under a residential
lease if the [tenant] RESIDENT or legal occupant is a victim of abuse.
(b) If a [tenant] RESIDENT or legal occupant is a victim of abuse, the [tenant]
RESIDENT may provide to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER the written notice
required under § 8–5A–03 of this subtitle and, if the written notice is provided, the [tenant]
RESIDENT shall have 30 days to vacate the leased premises from the date of providing the
written notice.
(c) (1) A [tenant] RESIDENT who vacates leased premises under this section
is responsible for rent only for the time following the [tenant] RESIDENT providing notice
of an intent to vacate until the [tenant] RESIDENT vacates the leased premises, up to a
maximum of 30 days.
(2) (i) If a [tenant] RESIDENT vacates the leased premises earlier than
30 days after the date the [tenant] RESIDENT provides written notice of an intent to vacate,
the [tenant] RESIDENT shall provide the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER with
written notice, signed by the [tenant] RESIDENT and notarized, by first–class mail or hand
delivery stating that the [tenant] RESIDENT has vacated the leased premises.
(ii) On receiving a notice identified in subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph, a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER shall inspect the leased premises
and, if the [tenant] RESIDENT has vacated the leased premises, provide the [tenant]
RESIDENT with a written statement that:
1. Confirms the [tenant] RESIDENT has vacated the leased
premises;
2. States the rent that the [tenant] RESIDENT is responsible
for under this subsection; and
3. States the amount of rent still owed by the [tenant]
RESIDENT or the amount of any overpayment of rent to be refunded.
(iii) For the purpose of calculating the rent that a [tenant]
RESIDENT is responsible for under this subsection, the [tenant] RESIDENT shall be
deemed to have vacated the leased premises:
1. If notice is delivered by first–class mail, on the date the
notice was postmarked; or
2. If notice is hand delivered, on the date the notice was hand

HOUSE BILL 1548 79
delivered to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER.
(iv) A [tenant] RESIDENT who vacates the leased premises earlier
than 30 days after the date the [tenant] RESIDENT provided written notice of an intent to
vacate and who fails to provide the written notice required under this paragraph shall be
responsible for the maximum rent required under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(d) If a [tenant] RESIDENT does not vacate the leased premises within 30 days of
providing to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER the written notice required under
§ 8–5A–03 of this subtitle, the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER is, at the
[landlord’s] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER’S option and with written notice to the [tenant]
RESIDENT, entitled to:
(1) All legal remedies against a [tenant] RESIDENT holding over available
under § 8–402 of this title; or
(2) Deem the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S notice of an intent to vacate to have
been rescinded and the terms of the original lease to be in full force and effect.
(e) The termination of a [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S future liability under a
residential lease under this section does not terminate or in any other way impact the
future liability of a [tenant] RESIDENT who is the respondent in the action that results in:
(1) A protective order issued for the benefit of the victim [tenant]
RESIDENT or victim legal occupant under § 4–506 of the Family Law Article; or
(2) A peace order issued for the benefit of the victim [tenant] RESIDENT
or victim legal occupant under § 3–1505 of the Courts Article for which the underlying act
was an act of abuse.
8–5A–03.
(a) If a [tenant] RESIDENT or legal occupant is a victim of abuse, the [tenant]
RESIDENT may terminate the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S future liability under a residential
lease under § 8–5A–02 of this subtitle if the [tenant] RESIDENT provides the [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER with written notice by first–class mail or hand delivery of an
intent to vacate the leased premises, including the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S or legal
occupant’s status as a victim of abuse.
(b) The notice provided under subsection (a) of this section shall include:
(1) A copy of a protective order issued for the benefit of the [tenant]
RESIDENT or legal occupant under § 4–506 of the Family Law Article;
(2) A copy of a peace order issued for the benefit of the [tenant] RESIDENT

HOUSE BILL 1548
or legal occupant under § 3–1505 of the Courts Article for which the underlying act was an
act of abuse; or
(3) A copy of a report by a qualified third party, provided that:
(i) The name and physical description of the alleged perpetrator are
redacted; and
(ii) The report was signed by the qualified third party within the
preceding 60 days.
8–5A–04.
(a) This section applies to an action for possession of property under § 8–402.1 of
this title against a [tenant] RESIDENT or legal occupant who is a victim of abuse.
(b) (1) A [tenant] RESIDENT is deemed to have raised a rebuttable
presumption that the alleged breach of the lease does not warrant an eviction if the [tenant]
RESIDENT provides to the court:
(i) A copy of a protective order issued for the benefit of the [tenant]
RESIDENT or legal occupant under § 4–506 of the Family Law Article;
(ii) A copy of a peace order issued for the benefit of the [tenant]
RESIDENT or legal occupant under § 3–1505 of the Courts Article for which the underlying
act was an act of abuse; or
(iii) A report by a qualified third party, provided that:
1. The name and physical description of the alleged
perpetrator are redacted; and
2. The alleged breach of the lease occurred within 60 days of
the date the report was signed by the qualified third party.
(2) If an act of abuse is raised as a defense in an action for possession of
property under § 8–402.1 of this title, the court, in its discretion, may enter a judgment in
favor of a [tenant] RESIDENT who does not provide the evidence described in paragraph
(1) of this subsection.
8–5A–05.
(a) A person who is a victim of abuse and who is a [tenant] RESIDENT under a
residential lease may provide to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER a written
request to change the locks of the leased premises if the protective order or peace order
issued for the benefit of the [tenant] RESIDENT or legal occupant requires the respondent

HOUSE BILL 1548 81
to refrain from entering or to vacate the residence of the [tenant] RESIDENT or legal
occupant.
(b) The written request provided under subsection (a) of this section shall include:
(1) A copy of a protective order issued for the benefit of the [tenant]
RESIDENT or legal occupant under § 4–506 of the Family Law Article; or
(2) A copy of a peace order issued for the benefit of the [tenant] RESIDENT
or legal occupant under § 3–1505 of the Courts Article for which the underlying act was an
act of abuse.
(c) (1) The [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER shall change the locks on
the leased premises by the close of the next business day after receiving a written request
under subsection (a) of this section.
(2) If the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER fails to change the locks
as required under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the [tenant] RESIDENT:
(i) May have the locks changed by a certified locksmith on the leased
premises without permission from the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER; and
(ii) Shall give a duplicate key to the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER or the [landlord’s] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER’S agent by the close of the next
business day after the lock change.
(d) If a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER changes the locks on a [tenant’s]
RESIDENT’S leased premises under subsection (c) of this section, the [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER:
(1) Shall provide a copy of the new key to the [tenant] RESIDENT who
made the request for the change of locks at a mutually agreed time not to exceed 48 hours
following the lock change; and
(2) May charge a fee to the [tenant] RESIDENT not exceeding the
reasonable cost of changing the locks.
(e) (1) If a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER charges a fee to the
[tenant] RESIDENT for changing the locks on a [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S leased premises
under subsection (d) of this section, the [tenant] RESIDENT shall pay the fee within 45
days of the date the locks are changed.
(2) If a [tenant] RESIDENT does not pay a fee as required under paragraph
(1) of this subsection, the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER may:

HOUSE BILL 1548
(i) Charge the fee as additional rent; or
(ii) Withhold the amount of the fee from the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S
security deposit.
8–5A–06.
A [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER may not disclose any information
provided by a [tenant] RESIDENT under this subtitle to a third party unless:
(1) The [tenant] RESIDENT consents in writing to the disclosure; or
(2) The disclosure is required by law or a court order.
8–603.
(a) A provision contained within a residential lease in which a [tenant]
RESIDENT is occupying the space as that [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S primary residence which
waives a trial by jury shall be invalid and unenforceable.
8–1001.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Covered individual” means a defendant [tenant] RESIDENT of a residential
rental property in a failure to pay rent case filed under § 8–401 of this title.
(c) “Designated organization” means the fiscal and administrative agent of a
county’s local workforce development board.
(d) “Pilot Program” means the Rent Court Workforce Solutions Pilot Program.
11–102.1.
(a) (1) (i) 1. Before a residential rental facility is subjected to a
condominium regime, the owner, and the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER of each
[tenant] RESIDENT in possession of any portion of the residential rental facility as his
residence, if other than the owner, shall give the [tenant] RESIDENT a notice in the form
specified in subsection (f) of this section.
2. The notice shall be given after registration with the
Secretary of State under § 11–127 of this title and concurrently and together with any offer
required to be given under § 11–136 of this title.
(ii) If an offer required to be given under § 11–136 of this title is not
given to a [tenant] RESIDENT concurrently with the notice described in subparagraph (i)

HOUSE BILL 1548 83
of this paragraph, the 180–day period that is triggered by receipt of the notice under this
section does not begin until the [tenant] RESIDENT receives the purchase offer.
(2) (I) The owner and the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER, if
other than the owner, shall inform in writing each [tenant] RESIDENT who first leases any
portion of the premises as his residence after the giving of the notice required by this
subsection that the notice has been given.
(II) The [tenant] RESIDENT shall be informed at or before the
signing of lease or the taking of possession, whichever occurs first.
(3) A copy of the notice, together with a list of each [tenant] RESIDENT to
whom the notice was given, shall be given to the Secretary of State at the time the notice
is given to each [tenant] RESIDENT.
(b) The notice and the purchase offer shall be considered to have been given to
each [tenant] RESIDENT if delivered by hand to the [tenant] RESIDENT or mailed,
certified mail, return receipt requested, postage prepaid, to the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S
last–known address.
(c) A [tenant] RESIDENT leasing any portion of the residential rental facility as
[his] THE RESIDENT’S residence at the time the notice referred to in subsection (a) of this
section is given to [him] THE RESIDENT may not be required to vacate the premises prior
to the expiration of 180 days from the giving of the notice except for:
(1) Breach of a covenant in his lease occurring before or after the giving of
the notice;
(2) Nonpayment of rent occurring before or after the giving of the notice; or
(3) Failure of the [tenant] RESIDENT to vacate the premises at the time
that is indicated by the [tenant] RESIDENT in a notice given to [his landlord] A RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER under subsection (e) of this section.
(d) (1) The lease term of any [tenant] RESIDENT leasing any portion of the
residential rental facility as [his] THE RESIDENT’S residence at the time the notice
referred to in subsection (a) of this section is given to [him] THE RESIDENT and which
lease term would ordinarily terminate during the 180–day period shall be extended until
the expiration of the 180–day period.
(2) The extended term shall be at the same rent and on the same terms and
conditions as were applicable on the last day of the lease term.
(e) Any [tenant] RESIDENT leasing any portion of the residential rental facility
as [his] THE RESIDENT’S residence at the time the notice referred to in subsection (a) of

HOUSE BILL 1548
this section is given to [him] THE RESIDENT may terminate [his] THE lease, without
penalty for termination upon at least 30 days’ written notice to [his landlord] THE RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER.
(f) The notice referred to in subsection (a) of this section shall be sufficient for the
purposes of this section if it is in substantially the following form. As to rental facilities
containing less than 10 units, “Section 2” of the notice is not required to be given.
“NOTICE OF INTENTION TO CREATE A CONDOMINIUM
...................... (Date)
This is to inform you that the rental facility known as ...................................... may
be converted to a condominium regime in accordance with the Maryland Condominium Act.
You may be required to move out of your residence after 180 days have passed from the
date of this notice, or in other words, after ..................... (Date).
Section 1
Rights that apply to all [tenants] RESIDENTS
If you are a [tenant] RESIDENT in this rental facility and you have not already given
notice that you intend to move, you have the following rights, provided you have previously
paid your rent and continue to pay your rent and abide by the other conditions of your lease.
(1) You may remain in your residence on the same rent, terms, and
conditions of your existing lease until either the end of your lease term or until
...................... (Date) (the end of the 180–day period), whichever is later. If your lease term
ends during the 180–day period, it will be extended on the same rent, terms, and conditions
until ..................... (Date) (the end of the 180–day period). In addition, certain households
may be entitled to extend their leases beyond the 180 days as described in Section 2.
(2) You have the right to purchase your residence before it can be sold
publicly. A purchase offer describing your right to purchase is required to be included with
this notice. If a purchase offer is not included with this notice, the 180–day period that you
may remain in your residence does not begin until you receive the purchase offer.
(3) If you do not choose to purchase your unit, and the annual income for
all present members of your household did not exceed .................. (the applicable income
eligibility figure or figures for the appropriate area) for 20...., you are entitled to receive
$375 when you move out of your residence. You are also entitled to be reimbursed for
moving expenses as defined in the Maryland Condominium Act over $375 up to $750 which
are actually and reasonably incurred. If the annual income for all present members of your
household did exceed ................... (the applicable income eligibility figure or figures for the
appropriate area) for 20...., you are entitled to be reimbursed up to $750 for moving
expenses as defined in the Maryland Condominium Act actually and reasonably incurred.
To receive reimbursement for moving expenses, you must make a written request,

HOUSE BILL 1548 85
accompanied by reasonable evidence of your expenses, within 30 days after you move. You
are entitled to be reimbursed within 30 days after your request has been received.
(4) If you want to move out of your residence before the end of the 180–day
period or the end of your lease, you may cancel your lease without penalty by giving at least
30 days prior written notice. However, once you give notice of when you intend to move, you
will not have the right to remain in your residence beyond that date.
Section 2
Right to 3–year lease extension or 3–month rent payment
for certain individuals with disabilities and senior citizens
The developer who converts this rental facility to a condominium must offer extended
leases to qualified households for up to 20 percent of the units in the rental facility.
Households which receive extended leases will have the right to continue renting their
residences for at least 3 years from the date of this notice. A household may cancel an
extended lease by giving 3 months’ written notice if more than 1 year remains on the lease,
and 1 month’s written notice if less than 1 year remains on the lease.
Rents under these extended leases may only be increased once a year and are limited
by increases in the cost of living index. Read the enclosed lease to learn the additional rights
and responsibilities of [tenants] RESIDENTS under extended leases.
In determining whether your household qualifies for an extended lease, the following
definitions apply:
(1) (i) “Disability” means:
1. A physical or mental impairment that substantially limits
one or more of an individual’s major life activities; or
2. A record of having a physical or mental impairment that
substantially limits one or more of an individual’s major life activities.
(ii) “Disability” does not include the current illegal use of or
addiction to:
1. A controlled dangerous substance as defined in § 5–101 of
the Criminal Law Article; or
2. A controlled substance as defined in 21 U.S.C. § 802.
(2) “Senior citizen” means a person who is at least 62 years old on the date
of this notice.
(3) “Annual income” means the total income from all sources for all present

HOUSE BILL 1548
members of your household for the income tax year immediately preceding the year in
which this notice is issued but shall not include unreimbursed medical expenses if the
[tenant] RESIDENT provides reasonable evidence of the unreimbursed medical expenses
or consents in writing to authorize disclosure of relevant information regarding medical
expense reimbursement at the time of applying for an extended lease. “Total income” means
the same as “gross income” as defined in § 9–104(a)(7) of the Tax – Property Article.
(4) “Unreimbursed medical expenses” means the cost of medical expenses
not otherwise paid for by insurance or some other third party, including medical and
hospital insurance premiums, co–payments, and deductibles; Medicare A and B premiums;
prescription medications; dental care; vision care; and nursing care provided at home or in
a nursing home or home for the aged.
To qualify for an extended lease you must meet all of the following criteria:
(1) A member of the household must be an individual with a disability or a
senior citizen and must be living in your unit as of the date of this notice and must have
been a member of your household for at least 12 months preceding the date of this notice;
and
(2) Annual income for all present members of your household must not
have exceeded ................. (the applicable income eligibility figure or figures for the
appropriate area) for 20.....; and
(3) You must be current in your rental payments and otherwise in good
standing under your existing lease.
If you meet all of these qualifications and desire an extended lease, then you must
complete the enclosed form and execute the enclosed lease and return them. The completed
form and executed lease must be received at the office listed below within 60 days of the
date of this notice, or in other words, by ..................... (Date). If your completed form and
executed lease are not received within that time, you will not be entitled to an extended
lease.
If the number of qualified households requesting extended leases exceeds the 20
percent limitation, priority will be given to qualified households who have lived in the
rental facility for the longest time.
Due to the 20 percent limitation your application for an extended lease must be
processed prior to your lease becoming final. Your lease will become final if it is determined
that your household is qualified and falls within the 20 percent limitation.
If you return the enclosed form and lease by ..................... (Date) you will be notified
within 75 days of the date of this notice, or in other words, by ..................... (Date), whether
you are qualified and whether your household falls within the 20 percent limitation.
You may apply for an extended lease and, at the same time, choose to purchase your

HOUSE BILL 1548 87
unit. If you apply for and receive an extended lease, your purchase contract will be void. If
you do not receive an extended lease, your purchase contract will be effective and you will
be obligated to buy your unit.
If you qualify for an extended lease, but due to the 20 percent limitation, your lease
is not finalized, the developer must pay you an amount equal to 3 months’ rent within 15
days after you move. You are also entitled to up to $750 reimbursement for your moving
expenses, as described in Section 1.
If you qualify for an extended lease, but do not want one, you are also entitled to both
the moving expense reimbursement previously described, and the payment equal to 3
months’ rent. In order to receive the 3 month rent payment, you must complete and return
the enclosed form within 60 days of the date of this notice or by ..................... (Date), but
you should not execute the enclosed lease.
All application forms, executed leases, and moving expense requests should be
addressed or delivered to:
.....................
.....................
.....................”
(g) A declaration may not be received for record unless there is attached thereto
an affirmation of the developer in substantially the following form:
“I hereby affirm under penalty of perjury that the notice requirements of § 11–102.1
of the Real Property Article, if applicable, have been fulfilled.
Developer
By ...............”
(h) Failure of a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER or owner to give notice
as required by this section is a defense to an action for possession.
(i) Failure to fulfill the provisions of this section does not affect the validity of a
condominium regime otherwise established in accordance with the provisions of this title.
(j) This section does not apply to any [tenant] RESIDENT whose lease term
expires during the 180–day period and who has given notice of his intent not to renew the
lease prior to the giving of the notice required by subsection (a) of this section.
(k) (1) A [tenant] RESIDENT may not waive his rights under this section
except as provided under § 11–137 of this title.

HOUSE BILL 1548
(2) At the expiration of the 180–day period a [tenant] RESIDENT shall
become a [tenant] RESIDENT from month–to–month subject to the same rent, terms, and
conditions as those existing at the giving of the notice required by subsection (a) of this
section, if the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S initial lease has expired and the [tenant] RESIDENT
has not:
(i) Entered into a new lease;
(ii) Vacated under subsection (e) of this section; or
(iii) Been notified in accordance with applicable law prior to the
expiration of the 180–day period that he must vacate at the end of that period.
11–102.2.
(b) The owner of a residential facility may not terminate the lease of any [tenant]
RESIDENT occupying any portion of the owner’s residential facility in order to avoid such
owner’s obligation to give the [tenant] RESIDENT the notice required under § 11–102.1 of
this title.
(g) If an application for registration is rejected by the Secretary of State pursuant
to subsection (d) of this section, or if a registration is revoked by the Secretary of State
pursuant to subsection (e) of this section, the Secretary of State may not accept the
application or reinstate the registration unless and until the owner has tendered to every
[tenant] RESIDENT whose lease was terminated in violation of subsection (a) of this section
an award for reasonable expenses.
11–111.
(a) (1) The council of unit owners or the body delegated in the bylaws of a
condominium to carry out the responsibilities of the council of unit owners may adopt rules
for the condominium if:
(ii) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, before a vote is taken
on the proposed rule, an open meeting is held to allow each unit owner or [tenant]
RESIDENT to comment on the proposed rule; and
(c) (1) Each unit owner or [tenant] RESIDENT may request an individual
exception to a rule adopted while the individual was the unit owner or [tenant] RESIDENT
of the condominium.
11–136.
(a) (1) (I) An owner required to give notice under § 11–102.1 of this title
shall offer in writing to each [tenant] RESIDENT entitled to receive that notice the right to
purchase that portion of the property occupied by the [tenant] RESIDENT as [his] THE

HOUSE BILL 1548 89
RESIDENT’S residence.
(II) The offer shall be at a price and on terms and conditions at least
as favorable as the price, terms, and conditions offered for that portion of the property to
any other person during the 180–day period following the giving of the notice required by
§ 11–102.1 of this title.
(III) Settlement cannot be required any earlier than 120 days after
the offer is accepted by the [tenant] RESIDENT.
(2) The offer to each [tenant] RESIDENT shall be made concurrently with
the giving of the notice required by § 11–102.1 of this title, shall be a part of that notice,
and shall state at least the following:
(i) That the offer will terminate upon the earlier to occur of
termination of the lease by the [tenant] RESIDENT or 60 days after delivery;
(ii) That acceptance of the offer by a [tenant] RESIDENT who meets
the criteria for an extended lease under § 11–137(b) of this title is contingent upon the
[tenant] RESIDENT not receiving an extended lease;
(iii) That settlement cannot be required any earlier than 120 days
after acceptance by the [tenant] RESIDENT; and
(iv) 1. That the household is entitled to reimbursement for
moving expenses as provided in subsection (h) of this section.
2. Delivery of a notice in the form specified in § 11–102.1(f)
of this title meets the requirements of this subparagraph.
(3) If the offer to the [tenant] RESIDENT under this subsection is not
included with the notice required by § 11–102.1 of this title, the 180–day period during
which the [tenant] RESIDENT is entitled to remain in the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S residence
does not begin until the [tenant] RESIDENT receives the offer.
(b) (1) (I) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section,
an owner may make any alterations or additions to the size, location, configuration, and
physical condition of the property.
(II) The developer is not required to make the boundaries of any
portion of the property occupied by a [tenant] RESIDENT as the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S
residence coincide with the boundaries of a unit.
(2) (I) In the event the boundaries of any portion of the property
occupied by a [tenant] RESIDENT as the [tenant’s] RESIDENT’S residence do not coincide

HOUSE BILL 1548
with the boundaries of a unit, then, to the extent reasonable and practicable, the owner
shall offer in writing to that [tenant] RESIDENT the right to purchase a substantially
equivalent portion of the property.
(II) The offer shall be at a price and on terms and conditions at least
as favorable as the price, terms and conditions offered for that portion of the property to
any other person and shall contain the statements required by subsection (a)(2) of this
section.
(c) Unless written acceptance of an offer made under subsection (a) or (b) of this
section is sooner delivered to the owner by the [tenant] RESIDENT, the offer shall
terminate, without further act, upon the earlier to occur of:
(1) Termination of the lease by the [tenant] RESIDENT; or
(2) 60 days after the offer is delivered to the [tenant] RESIDENT.
(d) Acceptance of an offer by a [tenant] RESIDENT who meets the criteria for an
extended lease under § 11–137(b) of this title shall be contingent upon the [tenant]
RESIDENT not receiving an extended lease.
(e) If the offer terminates, the owner may not offer to sell that unit at a price or
on terms and conditions more favorable to the offeree than the price, terms, and conditions
offered to the [tenant] RESIDENT during the 180–day period following the giving of the
notice required by § 11–102.1 of this title.
(f) Within 75 days after the giving of the notice required by § 11–102.1 of this
title, the developer shall provide to any county, incorporated municipality or housing
agency which has a right to purchase units in the rental facility under § 11–139 of this title
a list of the names and units of all [tenants] RESIDENTS who have validly accepted offers
made under this section within 60 days of the giving of the notice required by § 11–102.1 of
this title, except those offers which have terminated because of the granting of an extended
lease under § 11–137 of this title.
11–137.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Annual income” means the total income from all sources, of a
designated household, for the income tax year immediately preceding the year in which the
notice is given under § 11–102.1 of this title, whether or not included in the definition of
gross income for federal or State tax purposes. For purposes of this section, the inclusions
and exclusions from annual income are the same as those listed in § 9–104(a)(8) of the Tax
– Property Article, “gross income” as that term is defined for the property tax credits for
homeowners by reason of income and age, but shall not include unreimbursed medical
expenses if the [tenant] RESIDENT provides reasonable evidence of the unreimbursed

HOUSE BILL 1548 91
medical expenses or consents in writing to authorize disclosure of relevant information
regarding medical expense reimbursement at the time of applying for an extended lease.
(b) A developer may not grant a unit in a rental facility occupied by a designated
household entitled to receive the notice required by § 11–102.1 of this title without offering
to the [tenant] RESIDENT of the unit a lease extension for a period of at least 3 years from
the giving of the notice required by § 11–102.1 of this title, if the household meets the
following criteria:
(1) Had an annual income which did not exceed the income eligibility figure
applicable for the county or incorporated municipality in which the rental facility is located,
as provided under subsection (n) of this section;
(2) Is current in its rent payment and has not violated any other material
term of the lease; or
(3) Has provided the developer within 60 days after the giving of the notice
required by § 11–102.1 of this title with an affidavit under penalty of perjury:
(i) Stating that the household is applying for an extended lease
under this section;
(ii) Setting forth the household’s annual income for the calendar
year preceding the giving of the notice required by § 11–102.1 of this title together with
reasonable supporting documentation of the household income and, where applicable, of
unreimbursed medical expenses or a written authorization for disclosure of relevant
information regarding medical expense reimbursement by doctors, hospitals, clinics,
insurance companies, or similar persons, entities, or organizations that provide medical
treatment coverage to the household;
(iii) Setting forth facts showing that a member of the household is
either an individual with a disability or a senior citizen who, in either event, has been a
member of the household for at least 12 months preceding the giving of the notice required
by § 11–102.1 of this title; and
(iv) Has executed an extended lease and returned it to the developer
within 60 days after the giving of the notice required by § 11–102.1 of this title.
(c) The developer shall deliver to each [tenant] RESIDENT entitled to receive the
notice required by § 11–102.1 of this title, simultaneously with the notice:
(1) An application on which may be included all of the information required
by subsection (b)(3) of this section;
(2) A lease containing the terms required by this section and clearly
indicating that the lease will be effective only if:

HOUSE BILL 1548
(i) The [tenant] RESIDENT executes and returns the lease not later
than 60 days after the giving of the notice required by § 11–102.1 of this title; and
(ii) The household is allocated 1 of the units required to be made
available to qualified households based on its ranking under subsection (k) of this section
and the number of [tenant] RESIDENT executing and returning leases;
(3) A notice, delivered in the form specified in § 11–102.1(f) of this title,
setting forth the rights and obligations of the [tenant] RESIDENT under this section; and
(4) A copy of the public offering statement which is registered with the
Secretary of State.
(l) (1) If a conversion to condominium involves substantial rehabilitation or
reconstruction of such a nature that the work involved does not permit the continued
occupancy of a unit because of danger to the health and safety of the [tenants] RESIDENTS,
then any designated household executing an extended lease under the provisions of this
section may be required to vacate their unit not earlier than the expiration of the 180–day
period and to relocate at the expense of the developer in a comparable unit in the rental
facility to permit such work to be performed.
11–138.
(d) The provisions of any local law or ordinance adopted under this section shall
not apply to any of the following transfers of a rental facility:
(4) Any transfer of the interest of one [co–tenant] CO–RESIDENT to
another [co–tenant] CO–RESIDENT by operation of law or otherwise;
11–139.
(a) (1) (I) A county or an incorporated municipality may provide by local
law or ordinance, that a unit in a rental facility occupied by a [tenant] RESIDENT entitled
to receive the notice required by § 11–136 of this title may not be granted unless the county,
incorporated municipality, or housing agency has first been offered in writing the right to
purchase the unit at the same price and on the same terms and conditions initially offered
for that unit to any other person.
(II) The local law or ordinance shall designate the title and mailing
address of the person to whom the offer to the county, incorporated municipality or housing
agency is to be delivered and the title of the person who may accept the offer on behalf of
the county, incorporated municipality or housing agency.
(2) (I) The local law or ordinance shall provide that the offer to the
county, incorporated municipality or housing agency shall be made at the same time an
offer is made to a [tenant] RESIDENT of the unit under § 11–136 of this title.

HOUSE BILL 1548 93
(II) If a [tenant] RESIDENT accepts an offer of a unit made under §
11–136 of this title, then the rights of the county, incorporated municipality or housing
agency to such unit under an offer made under this section, whether or not accepted, shall
terminate.
14–128.
(b) Regardless of the terms of any contract, deed, covenant, restriction,
instrument, declaration, rule, bylaw, lease agreement, rental agreement, or any other
document concerning the display of flags or decorations by a homeowner or [tenant]
RESIDENT on residential property, a homeowner or [tenant] RESIDENT may not be
prohibited from displaying on the premises of the property in which the homeowner or
[tenant] RESIDENT is entitled to reside one portable, removable flag of the United States
in a respectful manner, consistent with 4 U.S.C. §§ 4 through 10, as amended, and subject
to reasonable rules and regulations adopted pursuant to subsection (d) of this section.
(c) The terms of any contract, deed, covenant, restriction, instrument,
declaration, rule, bylaw, lease agreement, rental agreement, or any other document
concerning the display of flags or decorations by a homeowner or [tenant] RESIDENT on
residential property may not prohibit or unduly restrict the right of a homeowner or
[tenant] RESIDENT to display on the premises of the property in which the homeowner or
[tenant] RESIDENT is entitled to reside one portable, removable flag of the United States
in a respectful manner, consistent with 4 U.S.C. §§ 4 through 10, as amended, and subject
to reasonable rules and regulations adopted under subsection (d) of this section.
(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the board of directors of a
condominium, homeowners association, or housing cooperative, or a [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER may adopt reasonable rules and regulations regarding the placement
and manner of display of the flag of the United States and a flagpole used to display the
flag of the United States on the premises of the property in which the homeowner or
[tenant] RESIDENT is entitled to reside.
(2) Before adopting any rules or regulations under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the board of directors of the condominium, homeowners association, or housing
cooperative, or the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER shall:
(i) Hold an open meeting on the proposed rules and regulations for
the purpose of providing affected homeowners and [tenants] RESIDENTS an opportunity
to be heard; and
(ii) Provide advance notice of the time and place of the open meeting
by publishing the notice in a community newsletter, on a community bulletin board, by
means provided in the documents governing the condominium, homeowners association, or
housing cooperative, or in the lease, or by other means reasonably calculated to inform the
affected homeowners and [tenants] RESIDENTS.

HOUSE BILL 1548
14–130.
(c) A contract, deed, covenant, restriction, instrument, declaration, rule, bylaw,
lease agreement, rental agreement, or any other document concerning the installation or
use of clotheslines on single–family property may not prohibit a homeowner or [tenant]
RESIDENT from installing or using clotheslines on single–family property.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or the terms of any contract, deed,
covenant, restriction, instrument, declaration, rule, bylaw, lease agreement, rental
agreement, or any other document concerning the installation or use of clotheslines on
single–family property, a homeowner or [tenant] RESIDENT may not be prohibited from
installing or using clotheslines on single–family property.
(f) Before adopting any restriction concerning the installation or use of
clotheslines on single–family property, a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER or the
governing body of a condominium, homeowners association, or housing cooperative shall:
(1) Hold an open meeting on the proposed restriction for the purpose of
providing affected homeowners and [tenants] RESIDENTS an opportunity to be heard; and
(2) Provide advance notice of the time and place of the open meeting by
publishing the notice:
(i) In a community newsletter;
(ii) On a community bulletin board;
(iii) By means provided in the lease or governing documents of the
condominium, homeowners association, or housing cooperative; or
(iv) By other means reasonably calculated to inform the affected
homeowners and [tenants] RESIDENTS.
14–133.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(4) “Eviction data” means, for each premises subject to a warrant,
regardless of whether an eviction occurs, the following information:
(i) The name of the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER of the
premises;
(ii) The street address, city, county, and zip code of the premises
subject to the warrant;

HOUSE BILL 1548 95
(iii) The date of filing of the complaint and the type of action;
(iv) For a hearing or trial relating to the complaint:
1. Whether the [tenant] RESIDENT appeared at the hearing
or trial; and
2. Whether the [tenant] RESIDENT had legal
representation;
(v) The date of entry of a judgment for possession;
(vi) If applicable, whether the right of redemption was foreclosed at
the time of the entry of judgment for possession;
(vii) The date of issuance of the warrant; and
(viii) The outcome of the issuance of the warrant, including:
1. An eviction executed by a sheriff’s office;
2. The cancellation of the warrant;
3. The expiration of the warrant; and
4. Any other outcome.
(6) “Warrant” means a warrant of restitution, a warrant issued to a sheriff
or constable commanding a tenant to deliver possession to a [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER, or a writ of possession, issued as the result of a judgment for
possession of residential property.
14–802.
This subtitle applies to an action for possession of real property filed on or after
November 1, 2023, by:
(1) A [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER against a [tenant]
RESIDENT under § 8–401, § 8–402, or § 8–402.1 of this article; or
(2) A complainant against a person holding possession of real property
under § 14–132 of this title.
14–804.

HOUSE BILL 1548
On or after November 1, 2023, at the execution of a lease, the [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER shall include with the lease a link to the fact sheet published on the
Department of Agriculture’s website under § 14–803 of this subtitle if the [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER knows that a [tenant] RESIDENT possesses a pet.
14–806.
(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, when possession of real
property is delivered to a [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER or complainant following
an action under § 8–401, § 8–402, or § 8–402.1 of this article or § 14–132 of this title, the
sheriff, constable, or other official shall:
(i) Immediately inspect the premises for any pet; and
(ii) Provide to the [tenant] RESIDENT or person who was holding
possession of the real property any pet on the premises belonging to the [tenant] RESIDENT
or person who was holding possession of the real property.
(2) If the [tenant] RESIDENT or person who was holding possession of real
property is not present at the time the real property is delivered to a [landlord] RENTAL
PROPERTY OWNER or complainant, the sheriff, constable, or other official shall:
(i) Contact an animal shelter or animal rescue organization to take
custody of the pet;
(ii) Provide the [tenant] RESIDENT or person who was holding
possession of the real property with the name and contact information of the animal shelter
or animal rescue organization where the pet is taken; and
(iii) Provide the animal shelter or animal rescue organization with
the name and contact information, including the telephone number if available, of the
[tenant] RESIDENT or person who was holding possession of the real property from which
the pet was taken.
(b) A person may not remove a pet from real property delivered to a [landlord]
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER or complainant following an action under § 8–401, § 8–402,
or § 8–402.1 of this article or § 14–132 of this title and leave the pet on public property or
a public right–of–way.
15–102.
Unless otherwise specifically provided in this article, the provisions of this article
are applicable on the effective date. In addition,
(17) Section 8–203(d) of this article applies to all security deposits held by a
[landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER before July 1, 1972, with interest accruing from

HOUSE BILL 1548 97
July 1, 1972, and to all security deposits received by the [landlord] RENTAL PROPERTY
OWNER on or after July 1, 1972, with interest accruing from the date of receipt.
Article – State Government
20–706.
(b) Except as provided in §§ 20–703 and 20–704 of this subtitle, a person may not:
(3) refuse to allow, at the expense of an individual with a disability,
reasonable modifications of existing premises occupied or to be occupied by the individual,
if:
(ii) for a rental dwelling, the [tenant] RESIDENT agrees that, when
the [tenant] RESIDENT vacates the dwelling, the [tenant] RESIDENT will restore, at the
[tenant’s] RESIDENT’S expense, the interior of the dwelling to the condition that existed
before the modification, except for reasonable wear and tear;
20–1028.
(b) (1) If the administrative law judge finds that a respondent has engaged or
is about to engage in a discriminatory housing practice, the administrative law judge shall
promptly issue an order for appropriate relief, which may include actual damages suffered
by the aggrieved person and injunctive or other equitable relief.
(c) An order issued under subsection (b) of this section may not affect any
contract, sale, encumbrance, or lease consummated before the issuance of the order and
involving a bona fide purchaser, encumbrancer, or [tenant] RESIDENT without actual
notice of the charge filed under this part.
Article – Tax – Property
9–219.
(a) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of a
county or of a municipal corporation may grant, by law, a property tax credit against the
county or municipal corporation property tax imposed on rental dwellings of owners who
provide reduced rents for any [tenant] RESIDENT who:
(1) is at least 65 years old;
(2) has been found permanently and totally disabled and has qualified for
benefits under:
(i) the Social Security Act;

HOUSE BILL 1548
(ii) the Railroad Retirement Act;
(iii) any federal act for members of the United States armed forces;
or
(iv) any federal retirement system; or
(3) has been found permanently and totally disabled by a county health
officer or the Baltimore City Commissioner of Health.
9–304.
(f) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Market–rate rental housing project” means a multifamily
dwelling containing five or more units in which none of the units are subject to government
restrictions on the amount of rent charged or the income level of the [tenant] RESIDENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the publisher of the
Annotated Code of Maryland, in consultation with and subject to the approval of the
Department of Legislative Services, shall correct, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, cross–references and terminology rendered incorrect by this Act. The
publisher shall adequately describe any correction made in an editor’s note following the
section affected.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.